name,Description
Ahipara,"'Northland, 16 km from Kaitaia. Lit. ahi: fi re; para: large fern, or a species of cabbage tree. Parts of both plants are edible, so literally the name could mean Fire at which para was cooked. Possibly a contraction of ahi parapara, an earth oven at which special rites are performed. Until the mid-nineteenth century the locality was known as Wharo, which can be rendered as Stretched out or At great length. The chief Tohe, wishing to know how far the tide had receded, ordered his slave to measure the distance by holding his arms out to count out the number of spans from high water level.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ahipara Banks,Named in association with Ahipara (locality) and Ahipara Bay on the adjacent mainland.  
Ahipara Bay," Meaning of Ahipara ""fire for cooking para (marattia salicina)"" Sourced from Infomap 346-01 Te Ika a Māui Edition 1 1995 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""fire for cooking para (a fern)"""
Akatārere,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
Ingoa tuturu/tawhito. Spelling correction, name derived from two words. 'Aka' meaning vine or supplejack and 'tārere' meaning to hang. So named to confuse the Pākehā settlers of the actual position of their ana kōiwi.
All the information has been orally provided by our kaumātua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by kaumātua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as kaumātua Rawiri Henare and kaumātua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information.
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare kaumātua Mangatowai Marae.
 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""hanging supplejack, named to confuse Pākehā settlers as to the location of burial caves """
Akatere,Origin and meaning unknown. 
Akaterere,Replaced by Akatere Trig Station 25/10/1951 no. 82 p. 1607 
Akerama,"'The Maori form of Aceldama, field of blood. In the Bible Aceldama was bought for 30 pieces of silver, the price paid to Judas Iscariot for betraying Jesus.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Araiteuru Pa,"'Lit. arai: to block; te: the; uru: entry. Araiteuru was Kupe’s pet taniwha.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Arawairua," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the pathway of spirits"""
Aupōuri Forest, Orthographic correction from Auporui Forest
Awanui,"'Northland, 8 km from Kaitaia. Lit. awa: river; nui: large. This descriptive name is found in several localities, and in some cases may be a transplant from Hawaiki.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Awaroa,"'The name occurs in a number of other places in New Zealand.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Awarua,"'Northland, 32 km from Kaikohe. Lit. awa: stream or river; rua: two. This ‘two river’ name may quite possibly have been derived from the junction of the Mangakahia and Awarua rivers at the place now called Twin Bridges. The Mangakahia is the only substantial tributary of the Awarua. This is a common name throughout Polynesia. On Rai’atea (French Polynesia) Avarua is a harbour which has two openings in the reef.'
Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010.
 "
Cape Karikari,"'lit. to dig or strip off. Now also officially known as Whakapouaka.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. Alternate name Cape Whakapouaka (1943 Hon p. 42)"
Cape Reinga,"'Northland, at the far north of the Northland peninsula. Maori name: Te Reinga, lit. te: the; reinga: leaping place. This is the famous Leaping place of spirits, a name also used for the underworld of the wairua, the souls or spirits of the departed who travelled northwards and leapt from the overhanging branches of an ancient pohutukawa tree into the surging waters that covered the entrance to the underworld — or the commencement of the long journey to Hawaiki. It was also known as Te Rerenga Wairua, lit. The leaping place of spirits. See also Three Kings Islands.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010.  "
Cape Reinga / Te Rerenga Wairua,"Te Hiku history: Te Rerenga Wairua is part of the spiritual pathway, of which Te Aupouri are kaitiaki. Stokes notes that Kupe declared Te Rerenga Wairua to be the departure point for the spiritual return to Hawaiki. Stokes recounted the following ancient whakatauaki: ""Papaki e nga I te Rerenga Wairua, Te tutakinga o Rehua, o Whitirea, He ara wairua i te Rerenga Wairua; Hear the resounding tides at Te Rerenga Wairua, It is the meeting place of Rehua, of Whitirea, The flight path of the spirits."" (Stokes, A review of the Evidence in the Muriwhenua Lands Claims, pp. 19-22. This is drawn from evidence of Waerete Norman, Wai 45, Document C19, p. 24). Miraka Szaszy started her evidence to the Waitangi Tribunal by stating that “on behalf of Ngāti-Kuri and Te Aupouri tribes, I stand to claim guardianship rights to the Mauri of Te Rerenga Wairua.” Szaszy noted that “the classical poetical description Te Rerenga Wairua has been used by our Maatua Tipuna from long ago. She also stated that “at the time of his departure, Kupe dedicated the promontory at Te Reinga as the place from where the spirits of the dead may take their departure from the Spirit World. He named if Te Rerenga Wairua. Henceforth our people have regarded this territory as a very tapu place to which we are all spiritually linked. This becomes more poignant during the loss of loved ones. Therefore, we lay claim to the guardianship of it for all these reasons” (evidence of Miraka Szaszy, Wai 45, Document A6, December 1987, p. 1 and 4). Waerete Norman cites the following (wai 45, Doc C19, pp. 29-30): ""Te Aupouri Ngāti Kuri, Nga Kia Tiaki O, Te Rerenga Wairua, I te Hiku O te Ika; Te Aupouri Ngāti Kuri, the guardians of, the Spirit Trail, the tail of the fish."" Te Rangihiroa (Sir Peter Buck) wrote in The coming of the Maori (Wellington, 1952, p. 439) “thus the path of the Māori spirit led north to Te Rerengawairua (the spirit’s leap), a rocky promontory near the North Cape”. Ngāti Kuri, Te Aupouri, NgāiTakoto and Te Rarawa are four of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These four iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""departing place of the spirits"""
Cape Whakapouaka," Meaning of Whakapouaka ""to make a support for a bird snare"" Sourced from Infomap 346-01 Te Ika a Māui Edition 1 1995 Alternative to Cape Karikari (1943 Hon p. 12) Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""to make a support for a bird snare"""
Cape Wiwiki,See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMDJCQkExNDJCMTEwMDgxNTBDMUM) 
Columbia Bank / Te Nuku-o-Mourea,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Te Nuku-O-Mourea is the place where the two tides of the Tasman Sea and the Pacific Ocean meet - one is tane, the other is wahine. 
Dorothy Urlich Cloher (The Tribes of Muriwhenua: Their Origins and Stories, Auckland University Press, 2002, p. 34) states 'The spirits ...surface where the two oceans, the Tasman and Pacific, meet at Te Nuku-o-Mourea'.
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""Te Nuku refers to ‘movement’ and Mourea is a spiritual name, being where spirits surface after entering Te Poka Tōrere"""
Great Island (Manawa Tawhi),Replaced by Manawatāwhi/Great Island 30/03/2005 45:1115 
Haupātōtō Bush, Orthographic correction from Haupatoto Bush
Herekareo,"Not ""Herekariau"" "
Herekariau,Replaced by Herekareo Hill 1943 Hon p. 10 
Herekino Forest,"Associated with Herekino (locality), Herekino Harbour. "
Hihi,"A Māori name seemingly adopted from Hihi Stream which flows into Mangōnui Harbour 2.5km to the southeast. Old pā sites on the adjacent hills pointing to lengthy and substantial Māori occupation included Te Hihi, a kāinga and wāhi tapu, which was midway between the stream and Hihi. In the 1850s the larger locality was referred to as Waiaua, although by the 1880s this name was restricted to the land between the Waiaua Stream and Waitetoki Stream. In 1844 before Lands Commissioner Colonel Edward Godfrey, Thomas Ryan claimed five purchases made from 1836-38 totalling 2280 acres (923 ha) for £128 in goods including oil, blankets, tobacco, soap and muskets for land stretching from Rangitoto Point to Waitetoki Stream. Ryan was awarded 1542 acres (624 ha) and Gilbert Mair senior (1799-1857) received a land credit for £1500 to resolve their dual claims to some of the land. Pana-kareo, known to the Europeans as Nopera (?-1856), disputed the rights of the chief to have sold the land. In the 1920-30s Hihi, which remained linked to Hihi Stream, was described as a ‘little settlement across the harbour from the township of Mangonui’. Subdivision of the peninsula commenced in the 1970s and Hihi appears to have been informally adopted from the stream. Pickmere (1905-73) labelled the adjacent beach as Hihi Beach in his Atlas of Northland’s East Coast Harbours first published in 1974. In 1985 the Surveyor-General noted that Hihi ‘a developing seaside resort’ was proposed as a new name to appear on topographical maps, but that a New Zealand Geographic Board decision was required for this to occur. Both Hihi and Hihi Beach were approved. "
Hikurangi,"'Northland, 18 km from Whangarei.'
Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Hikurua / de Surville Cliffs,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Te Aupouri prefers Hikurua not Paerutu as previously advised. Paerutu refers to a specific part of the Surville Cliffs, rather than the whole area as Hikurua does.
[See entry in the dictionary of New Zealand Biography for Jean François Marie de Surville](https://teara.govt.nz/en/biographies/1s28/surville-jean-francois-marie-de) Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""not known"""
Hohi,"Oihi is a misspelled name the name of the historic site, which was originally Hohi. Rangihoua was the name of the mission station, named after the nearby Rangihoua pā. Restoration of the original Māori name Hohi, the site of the first mission station established in New Zealand by the Church Missionary Society. "
Hohoura East,Replaced by Houhora East 23/01/1953 3:87 
Hohoura West,Replaced by Houhora West 23/01/1953 3:87 
Hōngaio Rock,Source: LINZ 
Hopekako,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
A documented pa site of Ngati Awa and later of Mokokohi tupuna of Ngati Kaitangata.
This is an ancient pa of the early Maori settlers Ngati Awa, Ngati Pou and the last known rangatira to use this pa was Mokokohi of Ngati Kahu o Whangaroa. 
Contributing Kaumatua have no relevant information of the relevance of its name Hopekako suffice to say it is probably relates to some far lost korero.
All the information has been orally provided by our Kaumatua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by Kaumatua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as Kaumatua Rawiri Henare and Kaumatua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s and early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information.
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare Kaumatua Mangatowai Marae.
 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""ancient pā of Ngāti Awa, Ngāti Pou"""
Horeke,"Origin and meaning unknown. Not ""Horoeke"". Original name for the district was possibly Hauraki, see XXI p280.; 'q.v.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Horoeke,Replaced by Horeke 31/03/1949 22:858 
Houhora,"'Northland, at the base of the northern peninsula. Lit. hou: feathers; hora: spread out. It is said that on more than one occasion feathers were spread out to dry in the sun near the harbour heads. An earlier spelling was Hohoura.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Hūkerenui,"An original Māori name that the Ministry for Culture and Heritage translated as ‘large cascade’. Variations exist. Edward Dollimore suggested ‘many waterfalls’ and Wises New Zealand Index for 1946 that it was named after a commonly played Māori game Huke - ‘causing a whistling sound’. Historian-journalist James Cowan (1870-1943) more circumspect in explaining the name of the local railway station, opted for ‘great cascade’. In 1873 Civil Commissioner, Henry Tacy Kemp (1818-1901), finalised the sale of 19500 acres (7891 ha) named Hukerenui for £1512. The deed was signed by Maihi Paraone Kawiti (1807-89) and others. Thereafter the land was proclaimed ‘as waste lands of the Crown’, under The Immigration and Public Works Act, 1874. Kauri gum digging licenses were auctioned in 1876 and 1881 but this activity had largely ceased by 1912. In 1886 Albert Elliot sought village homestead land in Hukerenui Survey District on behalf of applicants, who he described as North Islanders ‘sons of bush-farmers’ or ‘farm labourers’ and all ‘first class settlers’ without the means to pay cash for land. Under the Land Act, 1885 village settlements up to 5000 acres (2023 ha) could be set aside on public reserves and Crown land for sale with village sections up to one acre (0.4 ha) and small farm allotments of 50 acres (20 ha). Officials considered much of the area too swampy for settlement, and part was needed for future railway development. Never-the-less, entrepreneur and politician John Lundon (1828?-99), described as ‘devious, enterprising and manipulative’, and not without criticism, vigorously promoted Hukerenui and other village settlements. Conditions were challenging. After two years, in 1889 the original 82 farms had been consolidated into 45 properties on which 26 original and 19 others remained on 2154 acres (872 ha), of which 187 acres (76 ha) was in cultivations and carrying 217 cattle, 59 pigs and 43 horses. A post office opened in 1887 and the railway line reached Hukerenui around 1901-2. "
Hunoke,"'Northland. See Pakia Hill.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kaharoa Point,Replaced by Petu Point 31/05/2007 58:1514 
Kahuwhera Pa,"'Northland, Bay of Islands. Lit. kahu: garment; wera: burnt. The Maori village from which the point takes its name preserved the memory of a woman whose garment caught on fire, causing her to rush into the sea to extinguish the flames.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kahuwhera Point,"Site of an ancient pa which was destroyed in 1826 when the Chief Tui died, and Hongi's people from Keri Keri took over the pa without resistance and destroyed it. Correction of spelling from Kohuwhera, Replaces Kahuwera Point (1940 Hon p.12). The story for the point relating to the old spelling Kahuwere (Literally Kahu: garment, wera: burnt) There was a woman who was wearing a cloak which caught fire. She was standing on the point and she ran all the way down the hill and into the water to put the fire out. "
Kaiaraara Island,Mill Island 
Kaikai,"On the last journey of Tōhē, an early tupuna of the Northern Kurahaupō people, having passed a stream he named Pōkuru [Pukorokoro Stream], at the next river Tōhē and his servant found an exposed rock covered in mussels that afforded them a meal, thus naming it Kaikai. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""where Tōhē had a meal of mussels"""
Kaikohe,"'A contraction of Kaikohekohe: lit. kai: to eat; kohekohe: a tree (Dysoxylum spectabile) i.e. To eat the berries of the kohekohe; though kohekohe can also mean to yearn for food. According to the late Piipi Tiopira, the name originated from the sacking of Pakinga pa by a taua led by her great grandfather, Tuohu, alongside the chiefs Pakuru and Morunga. Following the pa’s fall, the surviviors (among them Te Kona and her infant son Hone Heke) fled to the bush and subsisted on kohekohe berries.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kaimamaku,"'Northland, 17 km from Hikurangi. Lit. kai: food, or to eat; mamaku: edible tree-fern (Cyathea medullaris).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kaimaumau,"'See also Haggers Point.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kaingaroa,"'Northland, 14 km from Kaitaia. Lit. kainga: area of land; roa: long. See also Kaingaroa Forest. There is another Kaingaroa in the Chatham Islands.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kaitaia,"'Kaitaia may be a contraction of Kaitataia: lit. kai: food; tataia: arranged or set in order. Tamatea-ure-haea, the son of Rongokokako, brought his wife Iwipupu here to feast on the plentiful kereru (wood pigeons). He built a pa called Tinotinoi at Orongotea, and when Kahungunu was born Tamatea buried the baby’s pito (umbilical cord) with three whatukura (sacred pebbles) as an iho-whenua (a link with the land). The local Maori were furious with Tamatea for this and the depredations of his followers, who had taken such toll of the kereru that the name of the district was changed from Orongotea: lit. place of bright fame, to Kaitaia, lit. food in abundance — perhaps in memory of what they had lost.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Karangi,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Takitumu 
Karaui Point,In lieu of Te Umukukupa 
Kareirareira Bay,Replaced by Karerarera Bay 1940 Hon p. 12 
Kareponia,"'Probably a Maori transliteration of California.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Karetu,"'Karetu was used by Maori women in sachets and girdles. The name also applied to a portage site at Otahuhu, Auckland.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Karikari Bay,Replaced by Karikari Moana 13/07/1995 69:1847 
Karikari Moana,"The name ""Karikari"" refers to the sea area from Moturoa Island, to Motutara, the western end of Puwheke Beach, and adjacent shore. The pepeha for the Ngati Kahu people of this area is Ko Puwheke te maunga (Puwheke is the mountain), Ko Karikari te moana (Karikari is the sea). Change from Karikari Bay (1943 Hon p. 12) "
Kauwhare Point,"Name submitted in August 1968  by the Navy Office of the Ministry of Defence after a survey of Hokianga Harbour had recently been made for charting purposes. This feature had been shown on an old Admiralty chart as Kouwarre Point, but not on maps. Further investigation revealed the correct spelling. Origin unknown. "
Kawakawa,"An original Māori name, literally the name of a forest shrub (Macropiper excelsum). Warenga, the elder brother of the noted explorer Ihenga, eventually settled at Kawakawa. In 1815 missionary Samuel Marsden (1765-1838) visited the riverbank village the name of which he transcribed as Cowa-Cowa. Missionary Henry Williams (1792-1867) was a regular visitor and by 1834 was conducting weekly church services at Kawakawa. In the late 1850s Henry Tacey Kemp (1818-1901) the District Land Purchase Commissioner, initiated the survey and purchase of the Kawakawa land blocks. Coal was discovered at Kawakawa in 1864 and commercially mined until the turn of the 20th century, the mines being the country's largest producer in the 1880s. In 1899 the town was significantly damaged by fire and largely rebuilt on the flats. A railway station was constructed in 1911. Austrian artist and environmentalist Friedensreich (Frederick) Regentag Dunkelbunt Hundertwasser (1928-2000) settled in Kawakawa in the 1970s. He designed the town's public toilets in his distinctive architectural style, which were competed in 1999 to become a tourist attraction in their own right. "
Kawakawa,"'Northland, 57 km from Whangarei. Lit. forest tree or shrub (Macropiper excelsum). The name can be found in a number of places. Kawakawa at East Cape is, in full, Te Kawakawa-mai-tawhiti, indicating that the name came from the Polynesian homeland Hawaiiki.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kawehītiki Point,"Te Rarawa history:
""Kawehītiki is bound in Te Rarawa history, particularly regarding battles and peace-making with Ngāti Korokoro, and also battles with Ngāti Whatua at te rae o Te Karaka.
Kawehītiki refers to the carrying (kawe) of those killed in battle – for example, the battles at nearby Maukoro pā – to a sacred place where they could be buried. The hitiki was the carrier or mat used to carry the deceased. It was the sacred uplifting and carriage of those warriors who died in battle at that place.
Kawehītiki was also important in terms of navigation between the south and north sides of the Hokianga. It is a prominent point jutting out into the harbour; locations could be judged from and by it (from Koutu on the south side of the harbour, for example):
Aroha Harris, 10/02/2008 "
Kawiti,"'After the chief who supported Hone Heke so ably at the cutting down of the flagstaff on Maiki Hill, q.v., and during the subsequent war in the north.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Keokeo Island,Named Keokeo instead of Motukeo or Motukeokeo. 
Kerikeri,"'The European settlers named it Gloucester Town, but the Maori name refused to be supplanted. Jerningham Wakefield gave the verb kerikeri a literal translation when he wrote, ‘I was very anxious to get to the survey-station at Keri-keri, or “Dig-dig”’.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kerikeri Inlet,"An original Māori name for the entire Kerikeri inlet is Te-waha-o-te-Rino translatable as ‘the mouth of anger’. Some early European sources referred to the ‘head of Kerikeri inlet’ meaning present day Kerikeri or Kerikeri Inlet, meaning the narrow water passage. John Edmonds (1805-65), a stone mason and former Church Missionary Society catechist who arrived in the Bay of Islands in 1834 purchased land previously occupied by Māori on the south side of the inlet in 1838. Initially Edmonds lived at Paetai on Hauparua Inlet, the first European family to reside on the south side of the Kerikeri Inlet. Edmonds purchased several land blocks in the area later seeking title for these pre-1840 transactions from the Old Lands Claims Commissioners’. Edward Dollimore (1904-72) who compiled the New Zealand Guide noted that in 1845, during the first phase of the New Zealand wars HMS Haszard anchored at the entrance of Kerikeri Inlet and set up a forge on the opposite shore in what became known as Blacksmiths Bay. The isolated settlements along the southern side of the inlet were initially connected to Kerikeri by launch. Kerikeri Inlet was used for this locality and the inland extension of the settlement by the early 20th century. A Kerikeri Inlet primary school was established in 1909 and Kerikeri Inlet Post Office operated from 1923-41. The Public Works Department commenced work on roads linking Kerikeri Inlet and Wharau to Kerikeri in 1937. After the road was completed, further rural subdivision in 1938 cemented the name Kerikeri Inlet. "
Kōhatupapā / Ranfurly Bay,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
A known pā site of Ngati Kaitangata seasonal/kaimoana gathering kainga noho.
Prior to the arrival of Lord Ranfurly to the Whangaroa Harbour, in approximately 1912, the bay and the surrounding land area was known as Kohatupapaa which was the name of the pa and seasonal kainga noho.
It was at the request of the local Commissioner of the day to name the bay after Lord Ranfurly in recognition of his visit to Whangaroa. This was later followed by a request to the land owners for land to be set aside as a reservation for the peoples of NZ to which the owners agreed. But as a consequence of my research was never officially completed or surveyed. The name Ranfurly was then applied to this bay.
Hence in consequence through the dealings of the Land Minister of the day and the chairman of the Whangaroa County Council the owners were to lose the whole peninsular which was set aside as a scenic reserve in 1919.
(Historic research Peter McBurney AIP 2004).
All the information has been orally provided by our kaumātua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by kaumātua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as kaumātua Rawiri Henare, kaumātua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s and early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information. 
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare kaumātua Mangatowai Marae.
 "
Kohinatupou Point,Replaced by Roimata Point 1943 Hon p. 29 
Kohinutopu Point,Replaced by Roimata Point 1943 Hon p. 29 
Kohotutea Point,Replaced by Ohautetea Point 13/07/1995 69:1847 
Kohukohu,"'Named by Kupe, who asked his people to prepare a great feast before their return to Hawaiki. When they failed to cook the hangi properly, he cursed them.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kohukohu," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the curse of Kupe on his people for opening a hangi before it was fully cooked"""
Kohumaru,"'Northland, 14 km from Mangonui. Lit. kohu: mist; maru: shelter; i.e. Sheltered from the mist.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Kohuroa-a-naki," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""slow moving thick fog"""
Kohuwhera Point,Replaced by Kahuwhera Point 12/01/1984 1:24 
Korakonui Creek,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Korokonui 
Korokonui Creek,Replaced by Korakonui Creek 31/03/1949 22:858 
Kororāreka Bay,"'Kororareka was the name for Russell, q.v., until 1844. Well known before Russell (or more strictly Okiato) became the first capital of New Zealand, Kororareka survives in the name of the bay. An aged chief lay dying and expressed a wish to eat the flesh of a penguin. When the penguin was cooked the chief was too weak to eat it, but he drank some of the water in which it had been boiled and murmured, ‘Ka reka te korora!’ — How sweet is the penguin.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Koutu,"'Lit. promontory, a descriptive name. The Northland promontory is probably a volcanic outcrop from the nearby Whirinaki Range. Its name in full may be Koutumaungaru (Mountain quake promontory); this has been recorded as Kotumungaro and Koutomongero. In the nineteenth century the place was referred to as One Tree Point, in reference to a large pohutukawa tree.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Koware No. 2,Replaced by Paraawanui 22/12/1954 80:2088 
Kōwhairoa Peninsula,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
All the information has been orally provided by our kaumātua Wake Tua  whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by kaumātua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as kaumātua Rawiri Henare and kaumātua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s and early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information. 
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare kaumātua Mangatowai Marae.
 "
Lake Manuwai,Name suggested by local Māori elders who had considerable local mana. 
Lake Ohia,"'Northland, 15 km from Mangonui. Lit. to approve, or to think on the spur of the moment.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Lake Ōmāpere,"Named from its proximity to the lake of the same name, which also distinguished it from Ōmāpere on the shores of Hokianga Harbour. One story about the formation of the lake collected by skilled interpreter John White (1826-91) says that it was the work of a taniwha named Waihou who made a hole in the land with his tail and then resided in the resultant lake. Literally translated as O - place of Mapere, a tall-plumed grass (Gahnia setifolia) colloquially known as 'cutty grass'. Publisher Alexander W. Reed (1908-79) was sceptical of an alternative advanced by Hare Hongi, the pen name of Henry Matthew Stowell (1859-1944), that linked 'pere' to 'pele' the Hawaiian volcano god. Stowell was descended from leading Ngāpuhi families and very well versed in language and lore and a skilled translator. Ethnologist Johannes Andersen (1873-1972), a member of the Honorary Geographic Board, was more sympathetic to Stowell's view declining to dismiss it out of hand particularly as the lake had volcanic origins and there were thermal springs in the area. Andersen suggested that Manawatu was an earlier name for the lake. Prior to 1915 Te Ahuahu was applied to some of this area. Hone Heke's (?-1850) pā Pukenui, also known as Te Ahuahu, was on the northeast corner of the lake, with Tamati Waka Nene's (?-1871) pā on the northwestern side. This was the heart of Ngāpuhi territory. During the 'northern war' in 1845, Heke built a new fortified pā, Puketutu. In March 1845 men of the 58th and 96th regiments under Lieutenant Colonel William Hulme (1788-1855) attacked Heke's pā with heavy losses. In hand-to-hand 'fighting with Heke and Kawhiti's men the soldiers were pushed downhill towards the lake' before rallying. By 1855 Henry Tacey Kemp (1818-1901), District Commissioner for the Purchase of Native Lands in Auckland District, had identified the 'rich country skirting lake Omapere' as an 'excellent site for an inland settlement'. A survey of 5000 acres (2023 ha) was completed in 1857 but the initial offer of £300 was rebuffed. Around 1912 a Lake Omapere Estate was established partly on the Tautahanga block by George Pitcaithly. Plans to subdivide it as dairy farms foundered for want of capital and in 1918 the land was offered to the Crown for soldier settlement. "
Lake Ōmāpere," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""place of Māpere"""
Lake Puahau,Replaced by Lake Puhau 16/11/1950 70:1989 
Lake Puhau,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Puahau 
Lake Tangonge,Not 'Tongonge'. 
Lake Tongonge,Replaced by Lake Tangonge 1943 Hon p. 32 
Lake Waiharera,Replaced by Lake Waiparera 22/12/1954 80:2088 
Lake Waingaro,Name suggested by local Māori elders who had considerable local mana. 
Lake Waiparera,"This explanation of the name was given by JC Andersen, '…the names of lake and stream where ducks (parera) abounded'. Parera is the Grey Duck. "
Maiki Hill,"'Also called Flagstaff Hill, q.v.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Maitai Bay,"Maitai is the name of the ancient pā which is on the Maitai Point headland in the bay. Change from Ohungahunga Bay (1943 Hon p. 22). Matai Bay GR 490083 deleted Meaning of Maitai ""from the sea"" Sourced from Infomap 346-01 Te Ika a Māui Edition 1 1995 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""from the sea"""
Maitai Point,Maitai is the name of the ancient pā which is on this headland. Change from Jolliffe Point (1943 Hon p. 12) 
Manawaora Creek,Replaced by Man-o-war Creek 1943 Hon p. 17 
Manawara Bay,Replaced by Manawaora Bay 1940 Hon p. 16 
Manawatāwhi / Great Island,"Manawatāwhi is the original Māori name for the largest of this group of Islands. Updating to current dual naming format on map from Great Island (Manawa Tawhi)"" and on chart from ""Great Island/Manawa Tawhi"". See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMDlCNjMyN0MxRTEwMEQwMjVBQUM)"" "
Manawatāwhi / Three Kings Islands,"Manawatāwhi is the original Māori name for this group of islands which were once occupied by Māori but are now a nature reserve. The largest was named Three Kings Island by Abel Tasman in 1643. Previously shown as Three Kings Islands on map and chart. Claudia Orange. ['Northland places - Aupōuri Peninsula', Te Ara - the Encyclopaedia of New Zealand, updated 2-Mar-09](http://www.TeAra.govt.nz/en/northland-places/1). See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMDlCNjMyN0MxRTEwMEQwMjVBQUM). Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""to hold one's breath at the beauty of the islands"""
Mangahawea Bay,On the North West coast of Moturua Island 
Mangamuka,"'Tamahotu, a Te Rarawa ancestor, stopped here on a journey from Hokianga to Oruru, and ate some muka.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Mangamuka Bridge,"A descriptive name for the area nearby to where Mangamuka River was bridged, initially in the 1880s. The wider area had the original Māori name of Mangamuka, literally translated as creek and muka the sprout of nīkau palm or a brittle flax and included a marae and 'Mangamuka Maori School'. Mangamuka Bridge was in use at least by 1893 when there was local opposition to efforts to build a licensed hotel. The original bridge was destroyed in a flood in 1916 by which time the name was well established. The replacement bridge was completed in 1922. In 1934 local residents approached Hokianga County Council to have their district named Mangamuka Bridge. This was approved by the Council in November 1934. Simultaneously 50 local residents and members of the Mangamuka Valley Settlers Association also petitioned the Minister of Internal Affairs to make Mangamuka Bridge official. The Director-General of Post and Telegraph services was agreeable to renaming their Taikawhana Telephone Office and the surrounding postal area as Mangamuka Bridge. Internal Affairs forwarded the petitioners' request to the Honorary Geographic Board. Board member ethnologist Johannes Andersen (1873-1962) was concerned about the likelihood of confusion between Mangamuka and Mangamuka Bridge, particularly as it might delay mail deliveries. With the two places 3km apart another Board member, surveyor Maurice Crompton-Smith (1864-1954) did not see difficulties. Early in 1935 the Under Secretary for Internal Affairs pressed the Board for a decision. Andersen expressed his opposition to what he saw as 'duplication' of names and indicated he would vote against the proposal. The Surveyor-General also thought the proposed name 'rather cumberous' but it was officially gazetted in 1935 under the Designation of Districts Act, 1908. "
Mangapiko Hill," Named (Mongpiko) on SO 762/B (1875), Trig N Mangapiko named on ML 6725 (1899)."
Mangaroa,Original name Maungaroa reinstated by 22/12/1954 80:2088 
Mangatoetoe,"'Northland, 14 km from Kaitaia. Lit. manga: stream; toetoe: native grass (Cortaderia sp.).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Mangawhero,"'Northland, 15 km from Opononi. Lit. manga: stream; whero: red.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Mangōnui,"'Northland, 77 km from Okaihau.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Mangōnui Forest,Associated with Mangonui (place and harbour). Orthographic correction from Mangonui Forest
Mangungu,"'In Advent of the Church Horace Fildes translated it as ‘broken ground’.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Manukau,"An original Māori name, site of a pā, trig point and adjacent land blocks. In 1908 The Interim Report of the Native Land Commission, comprising Sir Robert Stout (1844-1930) and [Sir] Āpirana Ngata (1874-1950), recommended ending private alienation of the ‘large and valuable’ 9280 acres (3755 ha) Manukau Block until after title to the adjoining Ahipara Block was resolved. Ownership issues persisted and in early August 1908 Karaka Rutene and 120 others applied to the Native Land Court for a hearing to settle matters. Rutene and 29 others petitioned the Parliamentary Native Affairs Committee later that same month, claiming that kāinga and cultivations had not been excluded from land sales as agreed. In 1909 the committee reported that it had ‘no recommendation’. Meantime in 1908 the Native Land Court, investigating titles in the Ahipara Block, also considered the partition of the Manukau Block. Manukau purchasers in 1914 included Auckland architect Richard Atkinson Abbott (?-1954) and an Auckland syndicate which commenced farm development. Questions in Parliament raised concerns about the related activities of barristers and solicitors Fergus Gale Dunlop (1885-1968) and Arthur Gilbert Quartley (1882-1967) land valuations and transactions. MP Tau Henare called for further investigations and the ‘washing up bill’ for 1916 returned to the petition of Rutene. Native Land Court Judges Jackson Palmer (1867-1919) and Walter Edward Rawson (1870-1933) began their investigation in September 1916. An agreement was reached to return 105 acres (42ha), fully reimburse 100 owners who had refused to sell but had lost land, with the Native Land Board to pay £140 to the purchasing company and Quartley and Dunlop to make up any deficiency. In 1922 the Herekino Land Syndicate purchased sections 8 and 9 of the Manukau Block. The Manukau Native School was established in 1926 and shown on the original 1:63360 topographical map sheet published in 1942, even though Manukau itself was not labelled. An 83 acre (367 ha) Manukau Block half grassed, and half still forested was subdivided for Māori land settlement in 1933 – part of Sir Āpriana Ngata’s (1874-1950) land development scheme. The Northern Advocate newspaper referred to the locality as Manukau North in 1937. Edward Dollimore (1904-73), who compiled The New Zealand Guide, noted in 1962 that Manukau was also known as Manukau North. "
Maomao Bay,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The name is derived from the Blue Maomao, which is common in the bay. Instead of ""Moumou Bay"", shown on maps "
Maoro Bay,Replaced by Maroro Bay 2/02/1967 4:120 
Maraeroa,"'Northland, 19 km from Okaihau. Lit. marae: courtyard or meeting area; roa: long. The name is also in use for the Maraeroa Plains in Waitomo District.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Maraewhiti Point,"'Originally just Maraewhiti. Named because it is the first marae (meeting place) on the peninsula to see the whiti (sun).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Maratea Shoals,"Maratea is the original Māori name for this feature. Not named on previous map. Dragon Teeth Shoals (not official) shown on previous chart.; 'Also known as Dragon Teeth Shoals.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. Corrigendum 2016-ln3278 corrects coordinates and description"
Maromaku,"'A young woman of rank had been imprisoned by a warrior, who stripped off her clothes to deter her from trying to escape. But she fashioned a skirt  from kiekie leaves and escaped by night. On arriving home with the leaves soaked in a river she had crossed, her father exclaimed, ‘Maro maku!’ (Wet skirt!).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Maroro Bay,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The name is Māori for the Flying Fish, which is not uncommon in these waters. Instead of ""Maoro Bay"" shown on maps "
Matanehunehu Island,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
‘A well known Pa site of The Tupuna Motupua of the Hapu of Ngati Kaitangata.’
All the information has been orally provided by our Kaumatua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by Kaumatua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as Kaumatua Rawiri Henare and Kaumatua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s and early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information. 
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare Kaumatua Mangatowai Marae.
 "
Matangirau,"'Northland, 7 km from Whangaroa. Lit. matangi: breeze; rau: leaf or leaves; i.e. Wind among the leaves. Once known as Towai, but changed to avoid confusion with Towai between Whangarei and Kawakawa.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Mātāpia,"Local name for the island, means 'like a head or face with a hole in it'. When misty, Matapia looks like a human head. Replaces Motupia 1936 Hon p. 20. For the full story of the island and of Raria and her hardship on the rock, refer Correspondence Vol 42. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""it looks like a head or face with a hole in it"""
Matapouri,"'Northland, 43 km from Whangarei. The meaning may be selected from gloomy, or black teal, or a shellfish, the last being the most likely for this pleasant sandy bay.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Matatirohia,"Matatirohia was named by surveyor J Allan Henderson (1909-2001), one of some half dozen features he and JE (Jock) Anderson named on Raoul Island in 1937-38 as part of a survey prior to the establishment of a weather and radio station. Matatirohia was a trig point that with Ngaio trig formed Henderson’s base line for his topographical survey of the island. His topographical map which included Matatirohia was completed in 1939. Ngaio appears to be linked to the presence of the forest tree of that name (Myoporum laetum) but the inspiration for and meaning of Matatirohia is uncertain and it may be a created and not a transported authentic te reo Māori name. The name Matatirohia was also applied to the aeradio camp. Henderson was a licensed surveyor with the Department of Lands and Survey and deputy leader of a party to Raoul Island headed by Public Works Department engineer, Jock Anderson. Oral tradition and archaeological evidence indicate that Raoul Island was a stopover point for voyaging to and from New Zealand and the Pacific Islands being known as Rangitāhua and a landing place of the Aotea waka. Stephenson Percy Smith (1840-1922) as Chief Surveyor of Auckland Land District made a survey of the Kermadec Islands in 1887 on their annexation by New Zealand. He described what was later labelled Matatirohia as ‘a small flat east of the [Fleetwood] bluff, of about 90 acres [36ha] overgrown with Ngaio and other wood, [which] is not of much use as the [1873] eruption covered it thickly with pumice’. ACS Wright’s soil map of Raoul Island published in 1959 included Matatirohia and the name was carried over onto later earth science publications discussing volcanic eruptions. "
Matauri Bay,"'Northland, 10 km from Kaeo. Lit. ma: stream; tauri: feathered ornament. Another suggestion, perhaps a fancied one, is Faces of the fi rst generation.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Matauri Bay,"'Northland, 10 km from Kaeo. Lit. ma: stream; tauri: feathered ornament. Another suggestion, perhaps a fancied one, is Faces of the fi rst generation.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Matauwhi Bay,"'The name remains to be interpreted. When Thomas Kendall lived in Pomare’s pa here in 1823, he called it Pater Noster Valley.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Maunganui Bay,"An original Māori name. When Maunganui came before the Honorary Geographic Board in 1939 both Sir Āpirana Ngata (1874-1950) and Pei Te H Jones (1898-1976) confirmed this name over that of Deep Water Cove. The latter name was widely used in the 1920s coinciding with the expansion of big game fishing and the publicity given to it by visitors such as the American writer of westerns, Zane Grey, who camped at Maunganui. Honorary Geographic Board member and ethnologist Johannes Andersen (1873-1962) preoccupied with literal translations puzzled over whether it ought to be Manganui – a large stream or river instead of Maunganui – a large mountain. This ambivalence was carried across into successive editions of publisher-writer Alexander Wyclif Reed’s (1908-79) Place Names of New Zealand. However, Edward Dollimore (1904-73), compiler of The New Zealand Guide, instead considered Maunganui an alternative name for Deep Water Cove. In 1943, in reviewing all names on the Bay of Island topographic maps, Andersen suggested to the Chief Cartographer of Lands and Survey that Deep Water Cove be limited to the northern lobe of the bay, that Maunganui Bay be used, and that Maunganui Peninsula replace Cape Brett. For good measure and consistency, he also believed Deepwater was preferable to Deep Water. These suggestions were not adopted in full. In 1948 the New Zealand Geographic Board included Maunganui in a list of names published in the Gazette and recognised as if they were final decisions of the Board under the 1946 legislation. In 1961 Raymond Evins (1922-2018) of the Hydrographic Branch of the Royal New Zealand Navy wrote to the Chief Cartographer of Lands and Survey supporting Deep Water Cove (Maunganui) being changed on the maps to Maunganui (Deep Water Cove) following the publication of the Bay of Islands tourist map NZMS 151. The Chief Cartographer replied that they were different features in terms of local use. Unfortunately, on the subsequent edition of NZMS 151 the two names were swapped in their positions. Deep Water Cove was once again shown for the larger bay, with Maunganui Bay now shown for the cove. This error promulgated out to other topographic products such the NZMS 1 N12, then NZMS 260 Q05 topographic maps. In 1997 it was finally resolved when the Secretary of the Board reviewed the new edition of Q05, advising the names needed to be swapped. "
Maungaroa,"Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Mangaroa (1943 Hon p. 17), note, no trig can be found."
Maungataniwha," Meaning of Maungataniwha ""mountain of taniwha"" Sourced from Infomap 346-01 Te Ika a Māui Edition 1 1995"
Maungataniwha Forest,"Associated with Maungataniwha (hill). Reed: Kupe’s taniwha was Araiteuru, which he left at Hokianga to guard his territorial possessions. After Kupe’s departure it left the estuary, stopped to spawn and creating a basin for water to flow into, while its young formed the beds of the  ributary streams. It was not until it reached Maungataniwha (Taniwha mountain) that the monster ceased its excavation. "
Maungataniwha Range,"Reeds Dictionary of New Zealand Place Names gives the following ""Lit. Maunga: mountain; taniwha; a monster that inhabits rivers, lakes, and deep pools. The taniwha was Arai-te-uru, belonging to Kupe, who left it at Hokianga to guard his territorial possessions. After Kupe's departure it left the estuary. Wherever it stopped to spawn, it created a basin for the water to flow into, while it's young formed the beds of the tributary streams. It was not till it reached Maungataniwha (Taniwha mountain) that it ceased it work of excavation."" Meaning of Maungataniwha ""mountain of taniwha"" Sourced from Infomap 346-01 Te Ika a Māui Edition 1 1995 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the resting place of the taniwha Āraiteuru, who created many basins for its spawn when travelling here from Hokianga"""
Maungataureia,Known as Maungataureia by those Māori people living north of the Maungataniwha Range and Te Huinga by those people living south of the range. Because the function of the Radio Station on the hill is that of a northwards looking radio path to the Kaitaia terminal the Post Office requested the allocation of the name Maungataniwha 
Merumeru Falls,Named after the Merumeru River on which they are located. 
Mimiwhanga,Replaced by Mimiwhangata 1943 Hon p. 19 
Mimiwhangata,"Replaced by Mimiwhangatangata 23/01/1953 3:86; 'Mimiwhangata Bay: A contraction of Mimi-whanga-tangata: lit. mimi: urine, or creek; whanga: bay; tangata: man or men.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Mimiwhangata Bay,"Mr B T O'Connell of New Zealand Breweries Limited submitted in July 1969, that as his company had since 1962 been the owner of Mimiwhangata Station, he was attempting to get some uniformity in the naming of the area surrounding the property. The bay, subject to Geographic Board rulings since 1933 was known as Mimiwhangatangata, while the property, road and Māori block were all known as Mimiwhangata, and when the area was developed for tourism it seemed incongrous that people would be asked to visit Mimiwhangatangata Bay, through Mimiwhangata. The NZGB approved Mimiwhangata bay, due to local usage, although noting that Mimiwhangatangata was the correct spelling. Instead of ""Mimiwhangatangata Bay"" (23/01/1953 3:86) "
Mimiwhangatangata Bay,Replaced by Mimiwhangata (26/02/1970 10:297) 
Mitimiti,"'A Maori chief once stated that the wairua (spirits of the dead) who travelled up the east coast on their way to Te Reinga (the leaping place of spirits) stopped here to quench their thirst. The stream spreads over a sandy beach, obliging the spirits to bend down and lap up the water.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Moehau,"'Northland, Waima. This is said to be an ancient name that came from Hawaiki and was given to the waters of Waima.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Moekawa / South West Island,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Moekawa Island is noted on a 1951 map of the Three Kings Islands held by Kaitaia Museum (map by Hohepa Kanara, Te Kao, 1951, held at Kaitaia Museum, map sections, map folder 3). Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""not known"""
Moerewa,"'The name may commemorate Moerewarewa, the daughter of Nukutawhiti, who is supposed to have lived in the locality. Moerewarewa is famed for deceiving her sister, Kairewa, into lamenting over a slave instead of their dead father.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Mokaikai Scenic Reserve," Parts of Mokaikai Scenic Reserve subject to the Reserves Act 1977 are revoked and the name discontinued (for those parts) under sections 28, 29, 30, 32 and 53 of the Ngāti Kuri Claims Settlement Act 2015 and sections 31 and 53 of the Te Aupouri Claims Settlement Act 2015."
Mōkau,"An original Māori name, and one which occurs in several places in New Zealand. Mōkau Stream was one of the few sources of obsidian in Northland Region. Edward Brissenden (1936-1907) purchased an unspecified area of land described as Mōkau from Horomaia, Te Aru and others for 2/6d an acre in late 1874. Brissenden was a Land Purchase officer who worked on a commission of 4d per acre acquired instead of a salary and made extensive purchases of Māori land in Northland from 1874-76 before being dismissed for fraudulently issuing mining licences. In 1953 the Chief Cartographer of Lands and Survey drew the Geographic Board’s attention to the fact that Mōkau was used to name three different localities, but the status quo remained. Edward Dollimore (1904-73), who compiled The New Zealand Guide observed in the early 1960s that Mōkau Bay was used, presumably to avoid confusion with other Mōkau. Mōkau Marae, belonging to the Ngāti Wai confederation, was destroyed by fire in 2013 but had been rebuilt by 2020. "
Motatau,"'Northland, 21 km from Kawakawa. Lit. talking to oneself. It was here the explorer Ihenga was heard talking to himself. The place has many associations with death, particularly for Te Rarawa and Te Aupouri, as in the lament ‘I te rimu e mawe ra ki Motau’ (Where the seaweed swirls at Motau). There may also be a link to an ancient carved house, which was given the name Motatau because its tatau (sliding door) was not at the front but in the side wall.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Motatau Forest,Associated with Motatau (hill) and Motatau (locality). 
Motiti Island,"'The voyagers on the Arawa canoe named it after a place in Hawaiki because they could find no firewood there. A proverb related to the Arawa’s arrival is: ‘Kei Motiti koe e noho ana’ (I suppose you are at Motiti as you can find no firewood). The island was often called Motiti-wahie-kore, because of the bareness of the land and lack of timber.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Motuarohia Island,"See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMDM5NUVBQjFCMjEwMDhFNENFMTk) 'Northland, Bay of Islands. Lit. motu: island; arohia: explore, turn/ Also known as Roberton Island.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. Alternative name Roberton Island."
Motuharakeke Island,"Was originally known as Flax Island, but name was changed to avoid confusion with the group of islands near Burgess Island known as ""Flax Islands"". Confirming true name of island known as Flax Island in Mokohinau Group "
Motuhuia, Assigned as per Survey ML 13305. The different island named Motuhuia Island on hydrographic charts was noted.
Motu Kapiti Island,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The name is Māori for island, cracked or creviced. The top of the stack has a very jagged appearance. "
Motukaroro,"Instead of ""Motukorora"" "
Motukauri Island,"'Lit. motu: island; kauri: tree (Agathis australis). Formerly known as Batemans Island. Another small island of the same name in the Hokianga Harbour was covered with kauri trees.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Motukawa," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""island of kawakawa shrub"""
Motukeo Island,Replaced by Keokeo 10/10/1974 100:2163 
Motukeokeo Island,Replaced by Keokeo 10/10/1974 100:2163 
Motukiekie Island,"'This was also the Maori name for Stop Island, q.v., in Dusky Sound.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Motukiore,"'Also called Ross Island. An island of the same name at the mouth of the Motueka River was so infested by rats that the plantations had to be abandoned.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Motukōkako Island / Piercy Island,"Literal meaning is Motu - island, kokako - nz crow. Named because the Kōkako were specifically placed there so that Chiefs had their own personal supply of Kōkako feathers. The island was named Piercy Island by Captain Cook, after Sir Piercy Brett (of Cape Brett) saying in his journal at the very point of the Cape [Brett]. is a small high island or rock with a hole pierced quite thro' it like the arch of a bridge and this is one reason why I gave the cape the above name because Piercy seemed very proper for that of the island"". Sir Piercy Brett was one of the Lords of Admiralty from whom Cook received his commission to explore the 'Southern Continent'. Name change from Piercy Island (Motukokako Island). See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMERFRjc4NDFEMzBGRUE5OTQzQkM)"" Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""kōkako were kept here for their feathers"""
Motukorora,Replaced by Motukaroro Island 7/02/1974 11:233 
Motukumara Rock,(Net Rock) 
Motuopao Island," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""island of Pao"""
Motupia Island,Matapia Island reinstated by 8/11/1984 204:4798 
Moturoa Island,"'Northland, Bay of Islands. Lit. motu: island; roa: long. This is one of the large islands in the bay, to which passengers from the wrecked Brampton were taken in 1823. There is another Moturoa Island in Queen Charlotte Sound.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""long island"""
Motutakapu,Motutakupu reinstated by 12/06/1986 89:2487 
Motutakupu Island,"Takupu is the Māori name for ""gannet"" and Motu is the name for Island. Correction of spelling from Motutakapu (10/10/1974 100:2163). Both ""takupu"" and ""takapu"" are listed in Williams Māori Dictionary as spellings for ""gannet"". The current spelling was accepted on the basis of ML 13305. "
Motutapu Island,Change from Green Island. 
Motutara Island,"'Northland, Bay of Islands. See Motutara Island, Bay of Plenty. Also known as The Twins.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Motutokape Island,"Meaning ""rock island having shellfish"". Instead of ""Waikare Island"" (Gazette, 1948, P.964). "
Moumou Bay,Replaced by Maomao Bay 2/02/1967 4:120 
Murimotu Island," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""any island adjacent to Muriwhenua"""
Muriwhenua,"'The Maori term for the peninsula that extends from the Maungataniwha Range to North Cape: lit. muri: end; whenua: land.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""northern most part of the land"""
Ngā Atua Tātā / Kerr Point,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Ngā Atua Tātā has significance to Te Aupouri as the site of a battle between the gods. There are also two pā sites near here, Ngā Tamariki and Ngā Mokopuna, which are the descendants ofNgā Atua Tātā.
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""site of battles between the gods"""
Ngapuhi,"'These were the decorative plumes on the bow of a waka taua (war canoe). Ngapuhi is also the name of the powerful northern iwi.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ngapuketaurete,Replaced by Ngapukeraurite 31/03/1949 22:858 
Ngapuketaurite,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Ngapuketaurete 
Ngārui-o-te-Marangai Beach,"NgāiTakoto history:
Korero that two tupuna, Hauraki and Tamatea were appointed the responsibilities and care of Papatuanuku and that of Tangaroa respectively. Hauraki oversaw the care of the kumara, taro etc, whereas Tamatea, the toa of the moana, ensured the seasonal observations and take of kaimoana etc. Tamatea was told by his very aged kuia, Ngarui, that she was hungry for the taste of titi (mutton bird) and she asked if he would go to Moutohora (Island) and bring her some back. This Tamatea agreed to do, knowing that it was a long swim. (Tamatea, understanding that in times of advanced age and or illness, people requested such things, as Ngarui now asked, as their literal last meal, a final taste of something to carry on their journey to the afterlife).
On his return journey Tamatea heard a voice crying, he recognised that voice and as he neared the beach and land his kaumatua came forward, hugged him, and advised him that his Kuia Ngarui had passed away while awaiting his return. Saddened and hurt by the loss of his Kuia and that he was unable to fulfil her request to the point that Ngarui would taste the flavoursome Titi, Tamatea called to the people and named the onepu after his Kuia: 
""NGARUI O TE MARANGAI""
Marangai is the easterly winds that blow into the harbour along this area, hence the slang term ""East Beach"". Marangai is also referred to in the Ngāi Takoto Whakatauki of the Rangunu harbour which forms the inlet harbour of East beach:
he iti marangai, tu ana te Pahukahuka he iti pioke no Rangaunu he Au tona.
(The marangai in this whakatauki refers to the easterly winds ""marangai"" that whips up the foam ""pahukahuka"" in the Rangaunu harbour.)
 "
Ngataea / Hooper Point,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
The name Ngataea appears on NZ Lands and Survey map of Reinga, Parengarenga & North Cape Survey Districts, 1920, R. P. Greville Chief Surveyor.
Ngataea also appears in brackets after Hooper Pt on NZMS 261, Sheet No 2, North Cape 1:50,000, 1984 and in the Reed New Zealand Atlas, p. 2.
In the hearings preceding the 1988 Muriwhenua Fishing Report Piri Paraone gave evidence referring to Ngataea as a fishing ground (Muriwhenua Fishing Report, 1988, p. 20).
It was here that Tōhē could hardly breathe when he was overcome by mist and fog.
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""where Tōhē could hardly breathe when he was overcome by mist and fog"""
Ngā Tai-i-whakatūria-e-Kupe-ki-te-marowhara," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the tides that were turned back by Kupe with his kilt"""
Ngatiwhetu,Origin and meaning unknown. 
Ngatokaparangi Islands,"Off the south point of Motukiakia. Not ""Ngatoku Parangi"" "
Ngawha,"'The original name of the hot springs may have been Ohaeawai, q.v., and that of Ohaeawai, Taiamai, q.v.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
North Ahipara Bank,Named in association with Ahipara (locality) and Ahipara Bay on the adjacent mainland. 
North Cape / Otou,"'Northland. The cape was sighted by Captain Cook on 10 December 1769. On 19 December he wrote: ‘The Point of Land abovementioned I have called North Cape, judging it to be the Northermost [sic] Extremity of this Country.’ Surville Cliffs (q.v.) are in fact the most northerly point of New Zealand. Jean-François Marie de Surville called the cape Cap Surville; Marion du Fresne called it Cape Eolus. The Maori name has been said to be Muriwhenua, q.v., but this is generally applied to the whole northern peninsula.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMEM2QjI3RkEyMzEwMDg2QTM0OTA) "
Nukutaurua Reef,Alternative name for Albert Reef: 1943 Hon p. 21 
Ōakura,"An original Māori name, Ōakura is said to be named after ‘ao-a-kura’ translatable as ‘the light-that comes with-the red sky’. The locality was long settled by Māori and contains many sites of cultural significance. By the 1930s, along with the sale of seaside sections the area now informally referred to as Oakura Beach, was gaining in popularity for bathing and fishing. The name Oakura Bay came into use in the 1940s to distinguish it from Oakura Beach in Taranaki. In turn this was replaced by Ōakura in the 1950s when a new 1:250000 topographical map series was being prepared. The Chief Cartographer of Lands and Survey identified 18 names that were duplicated and sought resolution from the New Zealand Geographic Board. "
Ōhaeawai,"'The township should properly be called Taiamai, q.v. (see also Bay of Islands). The Maori village is officially Ngawha, q.v., a word meaning ‘hot springs’. There is another tradition, that the grandsons of Nukutawhiti quarrelled over possession of the land, and the old man was grieved at the dissension. To stop the hostility he had his slaves dig a trench near Ohaeawai, and divided the two main groups to the north and south: lit. oha: the dying wish; ea: to spread; wae: to divide.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ohao Point,Also known as Coal Point. Instead of Ohau. 
Ohau Point,Replaced by Ohao Point 26/11/1953 67:1920 
Ohauroro Island,"'Northland, Whangaroa Harbour. An orchard of peach trees once flourished on the island.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ohautetea Point,"Correct name for the point, the origin is unknown. Change from Kohotutea Point "
Ōhau / West Island,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
After spirits leave Te Rerenga Wairua they dive under the water to Manawatawhi and ascend the summit of Ōhau, where they stop to look at their homeland and sing their laments, before moving on their spiritual journey to Te Reinga. The name Ōhau dates back to the ancients of Hawaiki. It also makes reference to the prevalent winds that can stir the seas in this area.
Stokes recounts evidence of Waerete Norman before the Waitangi Tribunal regarding a waiata tangi about Te Rerenga Wairua: 
“Rimui rimu tere tere
E tere ra i te moana
E ahu ana ki ripo
I raro ra e -.
Ka kati, ka puare
Mo wairua e -.
Te huringa i Muri Motu
Te huringa i Te Reinga
Te moana i kauria
Te wairua e -.
Ohau i waho ra 
Te puke whakamutunga
Haere whakangaro atu te wairua e.”	
“Seaweed drifting, drifting
floating out to sea
Flowing with the currents
the whirlpool below e
It opens and closes
for te wariua e
flowing around Murimotu
around Reinga
the seas swum
by te wairua
Behold the summit of Ohau
out yonder
Farewell e” 
(Stokes, The Muriwhenua Land Claims Post 1865 Wai 45 and Others, pp. 159-161).
Waerete Norman also submitted a transcript of W T H Panga talking about the spiritual pathway, which included the statement: ""naa, ka ruku nei ngaa wairua, ka whiti ki ngaa motu. E kiia nei, ko Oohau te mea mutunga, engari he maha aua motu. E kiia ana e etahi ko Tirii Kiingi, ko te puke tino mutunga mai, tenei e kiia ana ko Oohau. Ka tae ki reira, ka tangi mai ngaa wairua"" (""now the spirits dive under water and cross to the islands. It is said that Oo-hau is the last one, but there are many islands there. It is said by some that of the Three Kings Islands, the hill closest to here is Oohau. On reaching there the spirits sing their laments"") 
(Stokes, A Review of the Evidence in the Muriwhenua Lands Claims, Vol 2, pp. 717-718).
Stokes also notes that “West Island is known to Māori as Ohau, the place where the spirits who have departed from Te Rerenga Wairua pause for a last look at their homeland” 
(Stokes, The Muriwhenua Land Claims Post 1865 Wai 45 and others, p. 159).
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""a Hawaiki name, refers to the prevalent winds"""
Ohotutea Point,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Ohututea 
Ohungahuna Bay,Replaced by Maitai Bay 8/12/1994 133:4349 
Ohututea Point,Replaced by Ohotutea Point 26/11/1953 67:1920 
Oihi Bay,"Replaced by Rangihoua Bay 1940 Hon p. 28 'Northland, Bay of Islands. Lit. o: place of; ihi: power or authority.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ōkaihau,"'Northland, 34 km from Kawakawa. Lit. o: place of; kai: to eat, or food; hau: wind. It has been said that anyone who looks down the beautiful Waihau valley can appreciate the literal meaning, Feast of the winds. But it may also mean Place of Kaihau (lit. windeater), a term for a vagabond.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Okaihau Branch Railway,Replaced by Otira-Okaihau Industrial Railway (14/01/1988 2:31) 
Okiato,"'See also Russell, as it was so named for a short period. Its former distinction is recalled in nearby Russelton Point, and in occasional references to Old Russell.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Okupe Beach,"Literal meaning is ""the place of Kupe the famous explorer"" "
Okupe Island,"Literal meaning is ""the place of Kupe the famous explorer"" "
Omahuri,Name has been in local use for as long as they can remember. The derivation of the name is not known but Omahuri is the traditional name of the pa at this location. 
Omahuta,"'Northland, 35 km from Okaihau. Lit. o: place of; mahuta: to rise, or to land from a canoe; but possibly a personal name.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Omanaia,"'It seems more likely, however, that here it is a personal name.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ōmāpere,"'Omapere, Lake: lit. o: place of; mapere: a tall-plumed grass (cutty grass); i.e. Place of the mapere. The plant is also spelt mapara.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Oneho Hill,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The peak is connected to Tatua Peak by the main East-West ridge of Aorangi Island. Thus at the head of the valley, one on either side, stand Tatua, the last chief of Aorangi Island, and Oneho, his wife. This is the derivation of the name of Oneho Trig. Noted Māori authority W M Fraser being the source of the information. "
Onerua Bay,Replaced by Oneroa Bay 1936 Hon p. 22 
Ongaonga Beach,Replaced by Te Angaanga Beach 1943 Hon p. 34 
Ōnoke,"An original Māori name. The literal meaning was cautiously advanced by Edward Dollimore (1904-73), compiler of The New Zealand Guide, as ‘the place of earthworms’ on the basis of Lake Ōnoke in the Wairarapa. In 1870 a newspaper more enigmatically claimed that it ‘is either named after certain stones found there, or the stones are named after the place itself’. Ōnoke was a good point to cross the harbour to Te Karaka and a place where along-harbour journeys might be broken. Dublin born Frederick Maning (1811?- 83), a trader in the Hokianga  1833-37, returned in 1839 and purchased approximately 200 acres (81 ha) of land at Ōnoke, where he built a house and resumed business as a timber trader. Maning’s deed outlined the land boundaries and was signed by 15 Māori chiefs. Maning provided goods to the value of £100 including 220lb (100kg) of tobacco (valued at £22), guns and powder, 14 shirts, 15 pairs of blankets, 6 spades and £4 in cash. He used gunpowder to persuade Māori that he had banished a taniwha from a tapu pool at Ōnoke, an action for which he was never completely forgiven. In 1859 the Old Land Claims Commissioners, investigating pre-1840 land purchases, awarded him 99 acres (40 ha) at Ōnoke. A fluent Māori speaker, Maning served as a judge of the Native Land Court from 1865 to 1876, sometimes sitting at his Ōnoke property. In 1868 a dispute over land at Whirinaki caused Ngāpuhi to build two pā on the beach at Ōnoke and another on the hill beside Maning’s house while Te Rarawa constructed two wooden pā across the harbour at Karaka. James MacKay (1831-1912), the Civil Commissioner, and eight influential chiefs successfully mediated in the dispute. On a tour of Northland in 1870 Governor Sir George Bowen (1821-99) visited Ōnoke. Maning organized a ball and the next day Bowen met with 100 Māori from around Hokianga Harbour. "
Ōnoke Bank,Source: LINZ 
Opononi,"'This name was a household word in New Zealand because of the presence (1955–56) of the frolicsome dolphin Opo. G.G. Hooker found four renditions of the name: Oponui, Opononui, Oponini, and Opounoni. The first would mean Place of Ponui, but there is only one record of an ancestor called Ponui at Hokianga, and that long after the name was applied. Opononui means The place of great hospitality, in reference to the hospitality of local resident John Webster, but contemporary maps show the name applied beyond Webster’s property. Oponini was probably no more than a misspelling by J.A. Wilson, a judge of the Maori Land Court, in his Story of Te Waharoa and Sketches of Ancient Maori Life and History (1907). The fourth theory, put forward by Wiki Patuawa Nathan, has the name as a corruption of Opounoni, in reference to  to a crooked fishing post at the mouth of the Opononi stream, a favoured fishing spot.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Opounui Pa,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Oponui Pa 
Opua,"'A post office was opened on 1 September 1876 under the name Te Wharau, and was changed to Opua in March 1884, when the telegraph office was also opened. The Northlander (vol. 10, p. 13) said that in the 1880s it was called Newport, as it was the port from which Kawakawa coal was exported. Opua, according to the Mail Coach of April 1975 and October 1976, was in full Opuapua, Place of wrapped food, from an incident when Maori travellers, wishing to cross the bay, wrapped their food in leaves to preserve it. Williams’ Dictionary of Maori Language defines puapua as a present taken by visitors for the people of the kainga they are visiting. However, the name may be a corruption of O-poapoa:  lit. Place of tapu food. He writes: Although Williams defines ‘popoa’ as ‘sacred food’ reserved for the tohunga or ariki, or some other person in a state of tapu, Polack used the form ‘poapoa’ to refer to the same food. As Williams’ source is Grey’s Nga Moteatea, popoa perhaps could be a dialectical variation of the Northern use of poapoa. [There follows a quotation from Polack vol. 1, p. 238, which shows that poapoa was sacred food.] … There is a statement in The Northlander vol. 8, p. 39 that the name was originally Opua-pua (food-wrapped) in reference to a traveller, or in Mrs Keene’s account, wrapping his food in kawakawa leaves to keep it dry as he swam across the harbour. Hooker is reluctant to accept this explanation.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ōpua Forest,Associated with Opua (place) at Waikare Inlet 
Opuawhanga,"'Northland, 14 km from Hikurangi. While the name may be divided into o: place of; pua: foam; whanga: bay, it may have originally been Opuawananga: lit. o: place of; puawananga: clematis, a climbing, flowering plant (Clematis paniculata); or Opuawanga: o: place of; puawanga: land breeze at night, or south-west wind.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ōrapa Rock,Source: LINZ 
Oromaki / North East Island,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Oromaki Island is noted on a 1951 map of the Three Kings Islands held by Kaitaia Museum (map by Hohepa Kanara, Te Kao, 1951, held at Kaitaia Museum, map sections, map folder 3).
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""not known"""
Orongo Bay,"'Northland, Bay of Islands. Lit. o: place of; rongo: curving bay.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Oruapukapuka Island,Replaced by Urupukapuka Island 1940 Hon p. 38 
Oruru,"'Northland, 13 km from Mangonui. Lit. o: place of; ruru: morepork, the New Zealand owl (Ninox novaeseelandiae). But it has been said that, during a battle, a Maori chief whose men were being driven back shouted ‘Ruru!’ to spur them on to fresh efforts. In this case ruru means ‘attack’, or ‘close in’.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ōruru," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""place of the owl"""
Ōtaipango / Henderson Bay,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
The name Ōtaipango means dark or black waters. This is because of the black bull kelp that is abundant there.  Even the snapper are a black colour. Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""for the black waters due to abundant bull kelp"""
Otangaroa,"'Lit. o: place of; Tangaroa; a personal name, or the god of the ocean.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ōtangaroa Forest,Associated with Otangaroa (locality). 
Otawaki Island,Replaced by Waewaetorea Island 1938 Hon p. 39 
Otawhanga Island,Confirms the labelling on the current map 
Otehei Bay,"'Northland, on Urupukapuka Island. Lit. o: place of; te: the; heitiki: neck ornament. The full name was Oteheitiki.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Otehei Bay,"'Lit. o: place of; tahei: a bird snare.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Otira-Kawakawa Industrial Railway,Replaced by Otira-Okaihau Industrial Railway (14/01/1988 2:31) 
Otiria-Okaihau Industrial Railway,Replaces Okaihau Branch Railway (5/05/1977 49:1281) and Otira-Kawakawa Industrial Railway (14/01/1988 2:31) 
Otonga,"'Northland, 22 km from Whangarei. Lit. o: place of; tonga: south, or south wind.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Otoroa,"'Toroa was a chief. In preparation for his visit a huge plantation was made on the tableland near Matauri and christened O-Toroa.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ōtū," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""place of Tū"""
Otui Creek,Replaced by Otuhi Creek 1943 Hon p. 23 
Oue,"'Northland, 43 km from Kaikohe. Lit. o: place of; ue: species of fl ax; or the moon on the fourth night of the month. But according to legend, it is The place of Ue (or Ui), who went to the South Island with Maui.'
Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Owhanga Bay,Replaced by Owhatanga Bay 1943 Hon p. 24 
Ōwhata,"An original Māori name carried over from land blocks Ōwhata A and Ōwhata B on a small peninsula jutting into Herekino Harbour and the site of the Ōwhata Marae, kāinga of the hapū Ngāti Torotoroa. Ōwhata is connected ancestrally to the maunga Rawhitiroa, the awa Puhata Wairere and the moana Nga-Tai-o-e-Uru. Ōwhata grew in 1906 when the Mitchelson Timber Company set up a new sawmill employing 16 hands, cutting increasingly scarce kauri (Agathis australis) off Māori and European land. Thereafter in quick succession a named telephone office was opened in 1906 and a mail service commenced in 1907 along with the construction of a school that same year. Milling had ceased by 1912 and mill worker houses were sold off, families moved away, and the school closed. By 1920 Ōwhata attracted renewed attention as a seaside resort ‘Though it is little known, it possesses charms and advantages of a high order. The harbour has acres of safe, sandy-bottomed bathing places where the water has a uniform depth of three or four feet (0.9m to 1.2m). It has boating facilities and good fishing’. By this time Ōwhata (43 acres) [17ha] was also one of only two small blocks on the southern shore of Herekino Harbour remaining in Māori ownership as places to live. A contested dispute over a road line on the Ōwhata block in the 1930s led to an arrest and imprisonment. The Ōwhata reserves were further reduced by the creation of an esplanade reserve bordering the water in 1976. The Waitangi Tribunal visited Ōwhata in December 1990. In its assessment, the Crown had failed to properly survey the reserves and preserve access to the wāhi tapu. The peninsula itself has been considerably eroded on the western side since the 1890s. "
Owhatanga Bay,"Not ""Owhanga"" "
Paekauri,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
The area was set aside as a reserve and contains two ancient urupā – Ana kōiwi and had a stand of kauri (see Historic korero 2007 AIP). [Source of this information: Kaumatua Pita Pangari Kaumatua Taemaro Marae].
All the information has been orally provided by our Kaumatua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, supported by Kaumatua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as Kaumatua Rawiri Henare and Kaumatua Pita Pangari. 
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information.
 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""maunga with a stand of kauri"""
Paengarēhia / Twilight Beach,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Te Paenga ā Rehia is the landing place of Rehia - the place where Rehia or the Tasman Sea makes contact with the land.
Waerete Norman states that Rehua makes contact with the land at Te Paenga O Rehua (The Landing Place of Rehia) (Evidence of Waerete Violet Beatrice Norman, Wai 45, Document C19, p. 24).
Tuini Sylva refers to Rehia (Twilight [Beach]) in her evidence to the Waitangi Tribunal (cited in Stokes, A Review of the Evidence in the Muriwhenua Lands Claims, Vol 2, p. 745).
Stokes notes Rehua or Rehia is the Tasman Sea (Stokes, A Review of the Evidence in the Muriwhenua Lands Claims, Vol 1, p. 20).
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name."
Paewhenua Island,At the time the name was assigned the feature was also refered to as Government Island on charts 
Pahangahanga,"'The full name was Pa-hangahanga-noa-iho, which signifies an uncompleted fortified village. A beautiful girl named Te Ripo was sent from Hokianga to Kaipara on a goodwill mission. She was warmly welcomed by Ngati Whatua at Poutu. After a short stay there, she disappeared with an unknown man in a canoe in the direction of Oruawharo. An intensive search was made of the Oruawharo and Otamatea rivers, without result. Ngati Whatua then feared an attack by Hokianga people to find and rescue Te Ripo, and they built a number of pas. Five were built near the Oruawharo — Pokapu, Nga-ringa-o-matariki, Puatewhero, Huruhuru, Matawhero, and Pahangahanga (near Nuhaka). The last named was never completed, hence the name. In fact Te Ripo had fallen in love with a stranger to Ngati Whatua. They evaded the Poutu people, then returned to live on the West Coast as man and wife. As the man was not Ngati Whatua, they could not be blamed, and were not attacked.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pahi Bay,"Not ""Pahii"" "
Pahii Bay,Replaced by Pahi Bay 1943 Hon p. 24 
Paihia,"'The popular belief is that when selecting the locality for a Church Missionary Society mission station, the Rev. Henry Williams was impressed by the tranquil bay and exclaimed in a mixture of Maori and English, ‘Pai here!’, meaning ‘Good here’. This explanation seems too good to be true. What is much more certain is that Williams named the place Marsdens Vale after the Rev. Samuel Marsden, the founder of the New Zealand mission. It was known as Marsdens Vale for some years. The earliest use of the name is in a chart prepared by three officers attached to Isidore Duperrey’s expedition of New Zealand in 1824. Spelt ‘Payhi’, the name appears in Duperrey’s atlas, published in Paris in 1833.  In Adventure in New Zealand Jerningham Wakefield spelt the name Pahia.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pakanae,"'Jean Irvine in Historic Hokianga writes: ‘The name Pakanae, which means “mullet pa” was given when one Ngapuhi hapu or clan attacked the pa only to find all the warriors away, and the women and children peacefully preparing a welcome meal of mullet for the invaders. During the feast the local warriors crept back in one by one, and the fight was forgotten.’ However, other sources suggest that the likely time period, with its inter-tribal strife with Ngati Awa, point to an interpretation as Pakanae: The panting strife. At one time known as Newark.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pamapuria,"'It was thought to be the Maori pronunciation of Pompallier — Jean Baptiste François Pompallier, the pioneer Roman Catholic bishop of New Zealand. However, the Rev. Kingi Ihaka stated that this staunch Church of England Maori community would never have been named after a Roman Catholic bishop, and that it was the Maori form of Pamphylia, one of the provinces of Asia Minor visited by Saint Paul.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pananahe Island,Replaced by Pananehe Island 26/11/1953 67:1920 
Pananehe Island,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Pananahe 
Panguru,"'Northland, Hokianga Harbour. Lit. to make a rumbling sound.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Panguru Range,"Shown on maps as various names since the very early 1900s. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""to make a rumbling sound"""
Paraawanui,"Trig was renamed and as it took the approximate position of a peg named Parawanui on old ML plans, this name was submitted, with the spelling being corrected. Instead of Koware No.2 "
Paramata,Replaced by Paremata 1943 Hon p. 25 
Parapara,"'Northland, Doubtless Bay.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Parawanui Reef,Source: LINZ 
Parekura Bay,See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMDBEM0MzMjVBRjEwMUQ4RTdGQ0M) 
Paremata,"Not ""Paramata"" "
Parenga Channel,"'Northland, 93 km from Kaitaia. Lit. shellfish (Haliotis). Also called Paua. See also Parengarenga Harbour.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Parengarenga Canyons,Named in association with Parengarenga Harbour on the adjacent coast. Reed (2010:305) records lit. a sand bank. There are strong currents in the area that form sand corrugations on the bed of the bay.  
Pārengarenga Canyons,Named in association with Parengarenga Harbour on the adjacent coast. Reed (2010:305) records lit. a sand bank. There are strong currents in the area that form sand corrugations on the bed of the bay. 
Pārengarenga Pā,"Ethnologist-Geologist Leslie Adkin (1888-1964) offered a literal translation for Pārengarenga Harbour as being a kind of legging made of flax leaves. Artist and writer Augustus Earle (1793-1838) spent eight months in the Bay of Islands and Hokianga in 1827-28. Sailing from England in 1831, he became an official artist on the HMS Beagle. In 1832 Earle published A Narrative of Nine Months Residence in New Zealand. This included a passage about his visit to Pārengarenga Harbour and pā: 'visited Parengarenga, a village lying round the base of a large conical hill, about three hundred feet [91m] high, with a fortification on the top, which gives it its name, pa signifying in their language a fortified place. Behind it lies a swamp, which is covered at high water, and which adds greatly to its security'. In 1895 government surveyor Thomas Kirkpatrick (1862-1936), who from 1892-95 was engaged in 100 miles (160 km) of triangulation surveys between Waipu and Cape Maria van Diemen, produced a topographical plan of Pārengarenga that included pā sites. In 1958 the New Zealand Geographic Board confirmed Pārengarenga Pā as a feature in a review of names shown on existing of topographic maps. "
Pataea Bay,"Pataea is the original Māori name for this feature. Crater Bay (not official) shown on previous chart. Not named on previous map.; 'Also known as Crater Bay.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Patakorokoro,As named on SO 14863. 
Paua,See Parenga. 
Pawarenga,"'The name obviously refers to a trap or snare baited with food of some kind.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Peria,"'Northland, 14 km from Mangonui. The Maori form of the biblical Berea.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Petu Point,"Petu is the name of an ancestor. Not named on previous map or chart. Also referred to as East Point or Kaharoa Point (not official).; 'Also known as East Point or Kahuroa Point.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Piercy Island (Motukokako Island),Replaced by Motukokako Island (Piercy Island) 14/01/1988 2:31 
Pinakitanga Point,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The name means ""gently sloping"", and is singularly appropriate for this point, the only one on the island where cliffs or sheer walls are replaced by gently sloping rock. "
Pirau Creek,Replaced by Waihoanga Creek 1943 Hon p. 39 
Piwhane / Spirits Bay,"Te Hiku Forum history:
This has great significance as it is where Tōhē’s spirit was caught at the end of the spiritual pathway. 
Mutu Kapa (kaumatua of Whanau Pani hapu of Aupouri) stated, in evidence to the Maori Land Court in the 1957 Ninety Mile Beach case, the ancestor Tōhē and his servant came from Kapowairua to look for Tōhē’s daughter Raninikura. Tōhē’s grandfather, Ngaruru, advised him not to go lest Tōhē met his death. Tōhē replied “if I die you are to catch my spirit”. Thus, Tōhē gave that place the name Kapo Wairua (extract from Northern Minute Book Volume 85, p. 718, 12 November 1957).
Stokes also tells the story of Tōhē saying “te mea ma koutou he kapo mai taku wairua (if I should die, catch my spirit and stop it getting to Te Rerenga Wairua)” this giving the place name Kapowairua (Stokes, pp. 23-24).
Kapowairua is noted as papakainga in the evidence of Reverend Marsden, Wai 45, Document A7, “Te Mana O Te Hiku O Te Ika”, December 1986, p.3
According to the Bateman New Zealand Historical Atlas Ko Papatuanuku e Takoto Nei, Malcolm Mckinnon (ed), Auckland, 1997, plate 18, when Tōhē decided to journey to see Ranini-kura, his people did not wish him to go. His response was:
Whakarua e te hau, e tae ate karo
Whakarua I taku tamahine, e kore a taea to karo
Taea Hokianga, a hea, a hea
Ko ta koukou e kapo ake ai,
Ko taku wairua
I can shelter from the wind
But not from the longing for my daughter.
I shall venture as far as Hokianga and beyond
All that you shall possess,
Is my spirit.
Richard Taylor drew sketches labelled Kapowairua when he visited the area in 1841. These are held in the Alexander Turnbull Library.
Tuinui Sylva gave evidence at the Waitangi Tribunal hearings the Reweri Hongi was the paramount chief at Kapowairua. After Rewiei, Murupaenga became the chief at Kapowairua. Kapowairua was a kainga into the 1940s. Te Paraha Ratahi (who had been in Rewiri Hongi’s army), had told Tuinui Sylva that Ngāti Kuri would bring their captured  enemies back to a tree at Kapowairua to hang them. The name referred to what they would say in battle ‘kapohia mai tena, grabbing the spirits of their enemies and taking them to that tree’. (submission of Tuini Sylva, Wai 45, F33).
Wiremu Paraone told the Waitangi Tribunal that ‘on return from a trip to North Cape to his pā at Maunga piko, Tōhē was told that his daughter Raninikura had been stolen. Concerned, Tōhē decided to go and find her. The tribe’s kaumatua feared for his safety as he was getting on in age. To this he replied “Te mea ma koutou he kap mai taku wairua” hence Kapowairua is formerly Piwhane’ (evidence of Wiremu Paraone, Wai 45, Doc C13, p.2).
Dorothy Urlich Clother (The Tribes of Muriwhenua:Their Origins and Stories, Auckland University Press, 2002, p. 24.) states that “The name Kapwairua [Tōhē] gave to the place between Te Reinga and Murimotu Island, and area now commonly referred to as Spirits Bay and of great spiritual significance.”
Kapowairua is also noted in a map in The Muriwhenua Report (Figure 6, p. 31 and figure 9, p .37).
 Ngāti Kuri, Te Aupouri, NgāiTakoto and Te Rarawa are four of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These four iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""where Tōhē told his grandfather ""If I should die, catch my spirit and stop it getting to Te Rerenga Wairua"""""
Pokapu,"'A whare pokapu is a house with a door in the middle of the side wall, a most unusual arrangement.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pokere,"'lit. dark, black, pit, pulp of the tawa berry, or dark kilt. Pokohinu: See also Mokohinau Islands.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pouerua," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""a Ngāti Pou pā, the name refers to a type of shellfish"""
Puahau,Replaced by Puhau 16/11/1950 70:1989 
Puhau,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Puahau 
Puhipuhi,"'lit. plumes at the bow of a war canoe.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pukeangihau,Origin and meaning unknown. 
Pukehangihau,Replaced by Pukeangihau 31/03/1949 22:858 
Pukenui,"'Northland, Houhora Harbour. Lit. puke: hill; nui: large. Felton Mathew described ‘Pouki-nui’ as a large, flat-topped hill. See also Te Ahuahu. There is a Pukenui Beach in Hawke’s Bay.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pukepoto,"'Northland, 6 km from Kaitaia. Lit. puke: hill; poto: dark blue earth present in a nearby swamp, used as a pigment.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Puketapu Hill,"Important in Ohaeawai bombardment, see Cowan NZ Wars 1.68 and preceeding account: http://nzetc.victoria.ac.nz/tm/scholarly/tei-Cow01NewZ-c8.html "
Puketawhiringatua,As named on ML 6835 
Puketi,"'Northland, 15 km from Kerikeri; Otago, 11 km from Waitahuna. Lit. puke: hill; ti: cabbage tree (Cordyline sp.).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Puketī Forest,Associated with Puketi (place). Orthographic correction from Puketi Forest
Puketuaho,One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The name is taken from that of the last chief of the Māori on Tawhiti Rahi Island. 
Puketu Island,Correct spelling of name of Island 
Puketutu,"'Northland, trig points 8 km from Kaitaia, 12 km from Lake Omapere, 5 km from Mangonui; Waikato, 13 km from Te Kuiti. Lit. puke: hill; tutu: native shrub (Coriaria arborea), or a tree at which birds are snared.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Pukewharariki Forest,Associated with Pukewharariki (hill). 
Pumanawa Bay,Into which flows the Waipahiki Creek 
Pumanawa Point,"Pumanawa means ""the root (or source) of the mānawa tree"". This point is a place where the mānawa tree (mangrove tree) has always grown. Change from Waipapa Point. "
Punaruku,"'The name is an ancient one, imported from Hawaiki.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Purerua,"An original Māori name and old pā site. Publisher-writer Alexander Wycliff Reed (1908-79) suggested a sacred rite and two as a literal translation. The name was carried over to 416 acres (168 ha) which Thomas Hansen (1762-1837) occupied in 1832. Hansen, as captain of the brig 'Active', brought missionary Samuel Marsden (1765-1838) to the Bay of Islands in 1814. Returning as a non-missionary settler at Rangihoua Bay, Hansen worked as a carpenter, farmer and trader before moving to more fertile land at Purerua in 1832. In 1855 Hansen purchased 24 acres (9.7ha) at Purerua from Kingi Hori Kira and others in exchange for a stallion for which he submitted a declaration to the Old Land Claims Commissioners in 1858. On occasions from the 1870s-90s the name was incorrectly spelled in the press as Purirua. In 1880 visitor Dr RH Bakewell (1831-1908), a former army surgeon, was captivated by the attractiveness of the area: ‘These little bays are the most beautiful and picturesque places in the world. There are no tall trees in them, but plenty of nice ferns and trees of various kinds (including the beautiful Christmas tree [Pōhutukawa]), forming a low dense scrub. Here and there are found patches of smooth green sward, as closely grown as an English lawn, the remnants of former Maori cultivation. These are composed of a deep black soil, mixed with shells, to the presence of which they owe their continual fertility’. A primary school was opened by 1903. Ethnologist Johannes Andersen, a member of the Honorary Geographic Board, who undertook a sheet-by-sheet review of names on the provisional 1:63360 topographical map series in 1943, confirmed the existence of a post office at Purerua. "
Purerua Peninsula,See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMDJCQkExNDJCMTEwMDgxNTBDMUM) 
Puriri Bay,"Takes its name from a fine stand of Puriri trees in the bay. M L Plan 6655, surveyed in 1893, endorses a boundary mark on the southern headland of this bay as ""Puriri Tree, old mark"" "
Putataua Bay,"Instead of ""Putatawa Bay"" "
Putatawa Bay,Replaced by Putataua Bay 10/10/1974 100:2163 
Puweto Valley,One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The Poor Knights Islands; and more especially Puweto Valley on Aorangi Island; are unique in that on them is the last remaining sizable concentration of Spotless Crake in New Zealand. Puweto is the Māori name for Spotless Crake. 
Pūwheke,"Puwheke is taken from Te Upoko o te Wheke, ""the head of the octopus"". Puwheke is the taniwha encountered by the canoe Mamaru when it tried to enter the Rangaunu Harbour to the west. Change from Puheke; 'Puwheke Beach: lit. pu: head; wheke: octopus; correctly Pūwheke. According to McCully and Pātana Matiu in Te Whānau Moana, the hill was named for its similarity to an octopus: 'The head of the octopus is on the right-hand side, the legs are on the left.' There is a tradition that the remains of an octopus were dragged ashore here by Tamatea. The beach has been incorrectly recorded as Puheki.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. Meaning of Puwheke ""a taniwha met by the canoe Mamaru"" Sourced from Infomap 346-01 Te Ika a Māui Edition 1 1995 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""a taniwha met by the waka Māmaru"""
Puwheke Beach,"Puwheke is taken from Te Upoko o te Wheke, ""the head of the octopus"". Puwheke is the taniwha encountered by the canoe Mamaru when it tried to enter the Rangaunu Harbour to the west. Correction from Puheke Beach "
Raeroa,"Name probably descriptive, rae meaning promontory or headland, roa meaning long. Instead of Whakatere "
Raetea Forest,Associated with the hill of the same name. 
Rākaumangamanga," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""a many branched tree, an unstable tree"""
Rākautao Forest,"Associated with Rakautao (place). Lit timber, spear. "
Rangiahua,"'Northland, 21 km from Mangamuka. Lit. rangi: sky, or a chief; ahua: to approach.'
Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Rangiahwiao Pa,Replaced by Rangiawhiao Pa 13/07/1995 69:1847 
Rangiāwhiao,"Johannes Anderson knew the name Rangiawhia and had seen it used for the peninsula but suggested Rangaunu. Rangiawhia was the name of a pa above Parakerake Bay but no trace of it was found in 1943. The ancestors Te Parata and (his wife) Kahutianui (from whom Ngati Kahu are named) came from Tauroa (near Ahipara) and having come via Murimotu (Nth Cape area) on the Mamaru, landed beneath the mountain (Pūwheke) at the entrance to Rangaunu Harbour. They stayed there a while before moving across Karikari moana (bay) to Maroewhiti (where they established the main dwelling place of Te Whanau Moana hapu). They then sailed around Whakapouaka and down to Merita where Te Rorohuri hapu were set down to establish their turangawaewae. Te Mamaru (waka) continued on round to Parakerake then up the waterway Waimango (now only a swamp) and came out again at Pūwheke. Thus at this time the area was an island and the island was named Rangiāwhio from Te Rangi i Taiāwhiotia mai e Te Mamaru. 'The area circumnavigated by Mamaru (canoe)' N.B. The rest of what is now known as Karikari Peninsula is actually Tokerau (which is known only as the name of the beach to Pakeha). Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the area circumnavigated"""
Rangiawhiao Pa,"The ancestors Te Parata and his wife Kahutianui sailed from Tauroa, via Murimotu, landed beneath Puwheke mountain, sailed across Karikari Moana, establishing a dwelling place of Te Whanau Moana hapu. They sailed around Whakapouka and down to Merita where Te Rorohuri hapu were set down. Te Mamaru (waka) continued round to Parakerake then up the waterway Waimango (now only a swamp) and came out again at Puwheke. Thus the area at the time was an island and was named Rangiawhiao from 'Te Rangi i Taiawhiotia mai e Te Mamaru', ""The area circumnavigated by Mamaru (Canoe)"". Correction of spelling from Rangiahwiao Pa (8/12/1994 133:4349). For further details refer to correspondence. "
Rangiawhia Range,Replaced by Toupiroroa Range 8/12/1994 133:4349 
Rangihoua Bay,"In preference to Oihi; 'Named after a chief who was a very early navigator to Aotearoa.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Rangiora,"An original Māori name which is duplicated in various places across the country. Ethnologist Percy Smith (1840-1922) noted that in one of the traditions of voyaging of Kupe, he left an anchor stone at Rangiora. A pā known as Te Rangiora occupied this strategic site, a bottle neck overlooking movements along the harbour. The Customs Officer was initially based at Rangiora before relocating to Rawere. Former Royal Navy Lieutenant Robert St Aubyn’s home ‘Rangiora House’ was built was here after he was appointed a magistrate in 1843. The next year he also became Hokianga Harbourmaster. St Aubyn is considered to have introduced both oak trees and gorse to the area. In 1846 he left the area, having been appointed as Sub-Inspector of Police for the District of Auckland. Timber trader John Webster (1806-95) next occupied the house. In 1862 Rev. William Gittos (1829-1916) relocated the Wesleyan mission from Oruawharo to Rangiora. Judge John Rogan (1823-99) of the Native Land Court adjudicated on 233 acres (94 ha) at Rangiora in 1867. Soon afterwards, kauri sawmilling commenced here spreading to other locations in the Hokianga in the 1870s. The site was commercially valuable as the deepwater of the Rangiora Narrows enabled larger draught ships to moor for loading. In 1885 the Lands Board accepted seven tenders for sawmilling rights on the Rangiora Block ranging from 7d to 3/3d per acre. The medium sized Rangiora Timber Company was established on the foreshore by 1905. It cut 4000000 superficial feet in 1907 or 80% of its annual capacity and exported almost all its kauri and rimu, along with some kahikatea to Australia. The mill’s lengthy tramline ran back into the hills. A serious landslip in 1907 necessitated the relocation of the mill. In 1912 Umutahi hapū leaders complained that the company tramline crossed their land without permission or payment. After WWI the mill again concentrated on kauri for export to Australia. "
Rangiora Narrows,"Te Rarawa history:
The Narrows is a name that has been used to describe the narrowing of Hokianga Harbour as it turns towards Kohukohu. The original name of this area is Te Rangiora which is the name of a pā site prominent above the harbour at this point. Te Rangiora pā was an important strategic point in the defence of the Ngai Tupoto hapū of Te Rarawa. It provided good surveillance of the Harbour up river to Kohukohu, Utakura and beyond; across the Waima River; and downstream to Rawene, the Omanaia River, and down towards the Harbour mouth. The pā is mentioned in stories relating to the earliest altercations and battles that took place on this land nearly 20 generations ago.
More recently there was a mill and settlement called Rangiora within a few hundred metres of the pā site. Little remains of this settlement area except a reference on an odd old map. This site derived its name from the Pā. The Department of Conservation has a reserve called Rangiora about half a kilometre from this area. Again the name is derived from the pā site at “The Narrows”.
 Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""from the name of the adjacent pā that strategically controlled the channel"""
Rangi Point,"'Lit. rangi: sky.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Rangitāne," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""Ngāti Pou pā where the Te Roroa tupuna Te Taonga was killed"""
Rangiwhia Pa,Replaced by Rangiahwiao Pa 8/12/1994 133:4349 
Ratorutoru,Named on SO 4360 
Rawene,"'Northland, Hokianga Harbour. Formerly known as Herds Point, as the place where Captain James Herd of the Rosanna searched in vain for a suitable locality for the settlers of the first New Zealand Company in 1826. A story ascribed to Johannes C. Andersen tells of a dying chief who asked to be carried from his village to the top of the ridge so that he might, for the last time, watch the sun set. As the sun slipped below the horizon he murmured, ‘Wene te ra’, translated as The sun is dead (or dying).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Rawhiti,"'Other places of this name are in Wellington and Hawke's Bay.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Remuera Settlement,"The World War I Discharged Soldiers' Settlement legislation enabled demobilized aspiring farmers to ballot for farms on Crown land. The Remuera Settlement, a farm settlement under the Discharged Soldiers' Settlement Act, which comprised 3553 acres (1438 ha) and 31 farms of 76 to 373 acres (31 to 151 ha) was advertised in 1919 and ultimately adopted as the name for the wider locality. The name Remuera Settlement was approved by the Minister of Lands, David Guthrie (1856-1927) in 1919 prior to the land being balloted. In this instance Guthrie was approving the perpetuation of the name of the larger estate that Henry Dickeson (1857-1924) and Arthur Thayer Close (1880-1919) had purchased in 1910, which had functioned mainly as a Romney Marsh stud farm. Close died before the 1919 sale was finalised, with his transactions for some small areas of Māori land still incomplete. Previously a portion of the estate had been part of the Lake Ompaere Estate owned by Messrs Wright, Laing and Pitcaithly, itself on a portion of the Tautahanga block. The government purchased the land comprising the settlement from Dickeson with another portion being acquired from William Henry Wright (1872-1944) and his business partner George Pitcaithly. In 1918, Pitcaithly was residing in the Auckland suburb of Remuera. The name Remuera Settlement may include a word of Māori, but it does not appear to be an original Māori name for the locality. In updating names for inclusion on New Zealand topographic maps in 1985 the New Zealand Geographic Board recognised the area as a locality being on the then 'new national place name index'. In so doing it seemed not to have appreciated the earlier history of the area as a discharged soldier settlement. "
Rikoriko Cave,"Rikoriko can be translated as either 'to glitter, twinkle' or 'twilight, dusk'. "
Rimaariki," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""five chiefs"""
Rimariki Island,"Original Māori name for the island. Confirms the labelling on the current map. Islands were locally known as The Limericks, a corruption of Rimariki. "
Ririwha," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""chipped and scarred"""
Ririwha,"Trig on Stephenson Island (Mahinepua Island), geodetic code: A08A) "
Roimata Point,In place of Kohinatupou and Kohinutopu 
Ruahine Shoal,Possibly named after the RMS Ruahine. Reed (2010:354) records: lit. old woman or wise woman. 
Ruakora Point,Replaced by Ruakoura Point 1943 Hon p. 30 
Ruakōura / Perpendicular Point,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Ruakoura derives from ‘rua’, meaning pit, underwater cave and home of koura (crayfish). Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name."
Ruakoura Point,"Not ""Ruakora"" "
Ruapekapeka,"'Thousands of bats lived in hollow trees at one time. The name was given by the explorer and inveterate name-giver Ihenga. Garry G. Hooker notes that in the Maori Land Court records there are two northern explanations associating this place name with a bat’s nest, while another associates the name with a stored crooked stick.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Ruapekapeka," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""Kāwiti said of his stronghold “I am likened to a bat confined to a cave”"""
Runaruna,"'It is also the term for a Maori game.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Taemaro Bay,"Not ""Taimaro"" nor ""Taimaru"" "
Taheke,"'Bay of Plenty: at the head of the Okere River, also beside Lake Rotoiti. Lit. waterfall.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Taheke Rock,Reed (2010:383) records: lit. waterfall. 
Tāhuahua-Paopao-Karoro Island,"NgāiTakoto history:
Tahuahua Paopao Karoro (Walker Island) is located in the mouth of the Rangaunu Harbour and was, in earlier years, occupied by NgaiTakoto whanau.
According to traditional korero, the traditional name given by Ngai Takoto is Tahuahua Paopao Karoro.
Tahuahua (land mass) Paopao (the sound a baby chick makes as it emerges from an egg) Karoro (seagull). This is an ancient Ngai Takoto name that derives from the use of the island as a habitat and food gathering area.
This name is supported by a Kaimaumau korero relating to (Kura) who apparently while still a near new born baby, yet to be named, as a girl child, had been taken to the Island with her parents (her father being Kiritipa Te Awa and her mother Ngapeka (nee) Ngauma) and other whanau to collect kai such as kuaka, seagull eggs, and other food. Inadvertently the child was left behind when the whanau packed up and left. On realising what had occurred and with the retrieval of her from the island, the elders of the time decided that because of the incident, the child should be named after the island, so that in the first instance the near loss of a child would be remembered and no other parent would do the same, and secondly, the island’s name would be recalled by this incident and remembered. 
The child was therefore named Tahuahua Paopao Karoro Te Awa (Paopao for short), after the island.
Though the name refers to the abundant availability of seagull eggs on the island it also gives reference to its abandonment by its one time inhabitants. After suffering a calamitous storm that saw the island stripped of both vegetation and fertile soils, an accompanying sea surge that, coupled with the storm, removed possibly more than 9 tenths of its land mass. At one time the land area once stretched from what we see today, to opposite and past Kaimaumau point with an opposing shoreline on the Awanui channel. Today we see only a minute portion of what once was the island, now abandoned by its inhabitants, leaving only a habitat for the migratory kuaka and the seagulls to lay their eggs in prolific abundance.
 "
Taimaro Bay,Replaced by Taemaro Bay 1943 Hon p. 32 
Taimaru Bay,Replaced by Taemaro Bay 1943 Hon p. 32 
Taipa,"'Taipa River: Various accounts exist. According to one, after a period of fighting two chiefs erected a fence between their respective pa, calling the place Taiapa (dividing fence or boundary), eventually shortened to Taipa. In another version one of the same chiefs, Kauri, coveted lands close to the sea front and called the place where seafood was so plentiful Taipa: lit. tai: tide or sea water; pa: to touch. Again, Taipa may originally have been the name of a boulder placed in the river to stop a neighbouring iwi plundering pipi beds: lit. tai: sea water; pa: to obstruct. Finally, it has been said that the village by the sea was overwhelmed by a tidal wave, therefore tai meant the water of that wave, and pa their fortified village.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Taipa Bay,Alternative to Doubtless Bay 
Takapaukura / Tom Bowling Bay,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
Takapaukura means reed mat and is named for the mats used to repair the Kurahaupo waka on its journey to New Zealand.
Takapaukura is noted as a papakainga by Reverend Marsden in his evidence to the Waitangi Tribunal, 'Te Mana O Te Hiku O Te Ika' (Wai 45, Document A7 December 1986, p.2). He also notes on pp. 4-5 that the Kurahaupo waka made landfall at Takapaukura, which he states is 'a name given to commemorate the use of the mats as repair materials.'  Marsden stated that this referred to the tradition that when the migration waka arrived at the Kermadec Islands, the Kurahaupo was holed while crossing into the lagoon. The waka was repaired using woven mats which were held in place by timber placed over them and lashed with the sling-line of their seine net.
Stokes notes that Tom Bowling Bay was also referred to as Takapaukura. (Stokes, A Review of the Evidence in the Muriwhenua Lands Claims p. 47).
Dorothy Urlich Cloher states that ‘Pohurihanga and his companions continued on to arrive at the northern tip of New Zealand, passed Murimoto Island and landed at Te Wakura or Oakura in Takapaukura (now called Tom Bowling Bay)’ (The Tribes of Muriwhenua: Their Origins and Stories Auckland University Press, 2002, p. 16).
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""reed mats used to repair the Kurahaupō waka on its journey"""
Takitumu,Replaced by Karangi 29/09/1960 61:1515 
Tākou Bay," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""red ochre produced by burning a particular yellow clay"""
Tākou Bay,"An original Māori name associated with Tākou River. The Mahuhu or Māhuhu-ki-te-rangi canoe, in one tradition captained by Rongomai, landed at Whangaroa, Tākou and Whangaruru. In one of several versions of the story, on its return the canoe was turned to stone on the shore at Tākou Bay. In 1831 Archdeacon Henry Williams recorded that 500-600 Māori resided here; by 1870 this number had fallen to 50. This was five years after Land Purchase Commissioner, Henry Tacy Kemp (1818-1901), had secured the 2500 acres (1012 ha) Takou Block for £217/10/- or about 2/- per acre. Hori Kemara was the first of the 10 signatories on the deed. By 1891 1660 acres (672 ha) at Tākou Bay remained as Māori land and was regarded by officials as ‘unproductive’. In 1904 the Takou Bay Native School was established by the Auckland Education Board after discussions dating back to 1901. "
Tanekaha,"'Northland, 8 km from Hikurangi. Lit. Probably named after a native tree (Phyllocladus trichomanoides).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tapatu Bay,"Tapatu is the original Māori name for this feature. Not named on current map. Little Bear Bay (not official) shown on current chart.; 'Also known as Little Bear Bay.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tapuwae,"'Northland, Hokianga Harbour. Lit. footsteps (as for tapuae). The name was given by Turi; also formerly the name of a post office at Wairoa named by Sir James Carroll after a chief called Tapuwae.'
Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tapuwae Forest,Associated with Tapuwae (locality). 
Tarawatangata Point,"Not ""Tarawhatangata"" "
Tarawhatangata Point,Replaced by Tarawatangata Point 1943 Hon p. 33 
Tareha Point,"'Lit. red ochre.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tatua Peak,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The peak is connected to Oneho Hill by the main East-West ridge of Aorangi Island. Thus at the head of the valley, one on either side, stand Tatua, the last chief of Aorangi Island, and Oneho, his wife. This is the derivation of the name of Tatua Peak. Noted Māori authority W M Fraser being the source of the information. "
Taumarere,"'The name may refer to the fall associated with a local precipice. Another possibility is that the correct form is Taumariri: lit. tranquil season. In the very early days the name may have been applied to the whole Bay of Islands district.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Taumatara Point,"'According to McCully and Pātana Matiu in Te Whānau Moana, the original name Taumātara derives from taunga mataara, and means a lookout.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Taumataroa,"An original Māori name that was carried across to a Māori land block. In 1931 Sir Āpirana Ngata (1874-1950) implemented a Māori land development scheme. This included approximately 100 acres (40 ha) at Taumataroa, one of 149 units assisted in 1931-32 to the sum of £10085. In 1932, as the Great Depression deepened Ngata faced criticism over the management of the scheme and Prime Minister Geroge Forbes (1869-1947) established a Commission of Inquiry chaired by Justice (Sir) David Smith (1888-1982). The Tokerau Native Land Board was commended for its financial management of land development in its rohe, but Ngata resigned after the Commission’s report was released in 1934 because of irregularities in some other districts’ financial accounts. Ethnologist and Honorary Geographic Board member Johannes Andersen (1873-1962), in a 1943 review of names on the new provisional NZMS1 topographical map sheet N15 that appeared that same year, questioned whether Taumataroa was actually a mis-recording of Taumata-Karamu a hill near Lake Ōmāpere. Andersen referred to a specific section of James Cowan’s (1870-1943) The New Zealand Wars first published in 1922. Lands Department staff reported that old plans of the district did not include any names for the area, so Taumataroa was retained.  "
Taumutu,Corres Vol. XVIII p.161 (#90 in list). 
Taupō Bay,"Taupō was the name given to a Māori village in the bay attacked with great loss of life in 1826 during the musket wars. The Taupō Land Block gave its name to this locality although the bay was named West Bay in the Admiralty sailing instructions published in 1858. The local stream Taupō Creek was used as a locality name in the 1880s. In checking names on the new provisional NZMS1 1:63360 topographical series in 1942, ethnologist and Honorary Geographic Board member Johannes Andersen (1873-1962) advocated for the unnamed creek flowing into Taupō Bay / West Bay depicted on the map sheet to be shown as Taupō Creek. The Board agreed to this in 1943. In making his case Andersen referred to his comprehensive ‘card index’ which contained ‘a good deal of interesting historical information which should be preserved’. The 1942 topographical map listed Taupō Bay for the coastal feature with West Bay in brackets. This convention indicated that West Bay was the alternative name, a recent change as West Bay was the only name shown on the 1921 and 1951 cadastral maps of the area. Taupō Bay was used in newspapers in the 1940s for the coastal locality. In 1971 PJ O’Connell drew a detailed 170 section plan for the Taupō Bay subdivision. Taupō marae is a meeting place for the Ngāpuhi and Ngāti Kahu ki Whaingaroa hapū of Ngāti Rua. "
Tauranga Bay,"An original Māori name for the locality also applied to the stream, valley and ocean bay. Numerous pā sites along both sides of Tauranga Valley point to lengthy occupation. In 1836 Wesleyan missionary James Shepherd purchased about 2000 acres (809ha) of ‘land called Tauranga’. The boundaries are difficult to trace exactly, but the eastern limit was at Te Anina Point running inland along a ridgeline to the southern boundary at Tutu, a 169m hill at the southwestern corner, then running back to the coast.  Shepherd paid James Kemp Tupe/Hemi Kepa Tupe in goods and cash – 50 half crowns (£12/10), the goods included two cows, 25 blankets, 10 iron pots, 5 adzes, 10 axes, various other tools, and one 200lb (91kg) cask of tobacco. Shepherd settled permanently in New Zealand in 1821 and translated various religious texts into te reo Māori. Tupe, a Whangaroa chief, was a signatory of the 1835 Declaration of Independence. Tauranga Bay appears as a locality in newspapers from 1912. Tauranga Stream and the bay, Tauranga Bay, were named on maps from the early 1920s but Tauranga Bay for the locality did not appear on topographical and cadastral maps until 1959 and 1966 respectively. "
Tauranga Valley,"An original Māori name for the locality also shared by the stream, valley and ocean bay. Numerous pā sites along both sides of Tauranga Stream point to lengthy Māori occupation. In 1836 Wesleyan missionary James Shepherd purchased about 2000 acres (809ha) of ‘land called Tauranga’ stretching inland from today’s Tauranga Bay. Shepherd settled permanently in New Zealand in 1821, initially at Waimate North and in 1833 at Kerikeri before purchasing land at Tauranga three years later. Tauranga Valley was in local use by the 1920s although absent from Wises New Zealand Index as late as 1946 but it was included in Edward Dollimore’s (1904-73) The New Zealand Guide by 1952. The 1:63360 topographical map from 1942 uses Tauranga although by 1959 on NM Dudley’s 1:25000 map it had been replaced by Tauranga Valley presumably to avoid confusion with other places named Tauranga. The 1966 1:63360 cadastral map of the area drawn by Jan E Bradbourne included Tauranga Valley. "
Tauroa Point,Otherwise known as Reef Point 
Tautoro,"'Northland, 10 km from Kaikohe. Lit. to stretch forward. Rahiri, one of the paramount ancestors of Northland Maori, made a trip to Mangakahia and named places along the route. At Tautoro he rested, stretching out his cloak string, leading to the name, lit. tau: string; toro: to stretch. Another version is that Rahiri’s ngeri or shoulder garment was burnt and so, being a man of standing, the place was named: tau: cord; toro: burned.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tawhitirahi," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""widespread, named by Puhikaiariki after a similar island in Hawaiki"""
Te Angaanga Beach,"Not ""Ongaonga"" "
Te Araara Point,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The name is derived from that of the Trevally, a common fish in these northern waters. Instead of ""Araora Point"" shown on maps "
Te Arai Sanctuary," Te Arai Sanctuary ceases to be a Crown Protected Area and vests in the trustees of Te Rūnanga Nui o Te Aupouri Trust.
The vested land is subject to the Reserves Act 1977 and is named 'Te Ārai Nature Reserve'."
Te Au-kānapanapa," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""glittering current"""
Te Hāpua,"'Lit. te: the; hapua: depression, or lagoon.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Teheoriri,Instead of Tehe o Riri 
Te Hokianga-a-Kupe," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the returning of Kupe"""
Te Huruhi Bay,Name refers to an old pā at the north end of the bay. 
Te Kahika,"Kahika is a northern dialect word for the pohutukawa tree, and the large old tree in this bay was also probably used as a marker for fishermen.; 'Lit. The pohutukawa tree.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Te Kao,"'Northland, 66 km from Waipapakauri. Lit. te: the; kao: dried kumara. This was often taken for consumption during a journey, crushed to powder and mixed with water to supply a sustaining meal. Florence Keene’s Tai Tokerau notes that ‘te tino o te kao’ was ‘a large flat topped rock, white in colour’ on which the species of kumara taputini was dried. This rock presumably represented the mauri of the kao.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Te Kōhanga / Shipwreck Bay,"Te Rarawa history:
Te Kohanga is one of the oldest settlements of the Far North. The area was first referenced by Tāwhaki ā Hema in his archaic karakia concerning his seafaring adventures. The name Te Kōhanga is a metaphorical reference to the establishment of a safe haven or sanctuary within which the early Maori explorers could retire to retain sustenance and consolidate their strength.
The bay was named Te Kōhanga by Kupe some generations after Tawhaki, in association with the adjoining area name Te Angaanga, a burial area held sacred for its antiquity and status as a place of interment for people of high rank. Te Kōhanga was set aside for the living and Te Angaanga for the dead and this has remained the case until the present day.
Several generations after Kupe, new decendents arriving on the waka Ngātokimatawhaorua and Māmari also began to populate the area. However, it was the arrival of the Tinana waka captained by Tūmoana that immortalized the name Te Kōhanga and the genealogical basis upon which the Iwi of Te Rarawa is founded.
Te Kōhanga became the haven of the descendants of Tumoana reaffirming the name and function of the bay as the safest place from adverse weather along the entire north western tip of the tail of the fish. Toakai, descendant of Tūmoana, also established Te Kōhanga as his tūrangawaewae. Taurtaru the eponymous ancestor of Te Rarawa further consolidated the mana of Te Rarawa though Poroa and later Panakareao.
Even today Te Kōhanga is used as a safe haven from storms by all manner of ships and waka.
Māori communities of the Far North continue to refer to the bay as Te Kōhanga in spite of the fact that Pākēha people have come generally to refer to it as Shipwreck Bay after the grounding of a trade steamer at the turn of the 18th Century.
Whilst the Pākēha name has attained common usage the ‘mana’ and antiquity of the name Te Kōhanga is of deep historical and national significance symbolising the burning fires of occupation for over fifteen hundred years. Te Rarawa descendants remain a tangible manifestation of the ahi kaa and reserves the right as tangata whenua to insist upon our indigenous nomenclature. 
Consequently Te Rarawa seeks the instatement of the name Te Kōhanga over the bay while retaining the English name as that is commonly used by non-Māori of the area.
 "
Te Komanga Bay,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
Kainga noho of the Ngati Kaitangata and where they met their demise during the battle of Okahumoko in 1826. Also the location of the urupa where the Tupuna Hone Tua is interred.
Te Komanga means to store or the storage of food. It was deemed as ideal for the preparation of seasonal foods to support the nearby Pa of Okahumoko.
Kahu being a distant Tupuna of Kahukura ariki and moko to mean mokomoko (lizard) kaitiaki. 'The moko moko of Kahu', which is also the kaitiaki of the pa and the ana Ko Iwi within the whenua of Kowhairoa Peninsular. 
The hapu of Kaitangata also used bay to whakatau their waka, hence the application of the name 'Te Komanga Bay.’
All the information has been orally provided by our Kaumatua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by Kaumatua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as Kaumatua Rawiri Henare and Kaumatua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s and early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information.
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare Kaumatua Mangatowai Marae.
 "
Te Ngaere,"""Ngaere"" means ""swampy ground"". This is the correct spelling of the name. Correction from Te Ngaire "
Te Ngaire,Replaced by Te Ngaere 28/10/1999 161:3841 
Te Nunuhe Rock,See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMEFEMEVFREQ3RjEwMDJFM0U2ODg) 
Te Oneroa-a-Tōhē / Ninety Mile Beach,"Te Hiku Forum history:
“Tōhē is an eponymous ancestor of the people of the Far North whose ancestry traces to the Kurahaupo waka and to the original inhabitants of the Murimotu on the Far North eastern peninsular.
Tōhē was renowned for his exploits which are embodied in the landscape by the many places he named. It is remarkable that so many of the names he gave to various locations have survived in iwi history for more than one thousand years.
The name Te Oneroa-a-Tōhē, is not only the name given to the long stretch of coastline more commonly known as Ninety Mile Beach, but also a reference to Tōhē’s endevours which resulted in the naming of every feature of land and at sea along its length. Moreover each name represents a specific event concerning Tōhē and all of these names have survived among Te Rarawa descendents through to today. They are our map of the beach indicating the signs and times for coastal activities from fishing to the gathering of plant life. This is not to say that Tōhē was the only ancestor with [links to] the beach. Kupe established the Ara Wairua, the sacred path for Māori spirits to return to Hawaiki, and the lives of subsequent tupuna are marked by the middens and sacred sites that remain along the length and breadth of Te Oneroa-a-Tōhē.
One of the most important taonga along Te Oneroa-a-Tōhē, for Māori generally and not Te Rarawa alone, is the Ara Wairua. As tangata whenua, Te Rarawa has kaitiakitanga for the Ara Wairua from where it appears on the beach at Paripari in Ahipara. It continues northwards down the beach between the high and low tide marks.
Besides a source of spiritual sustenance, Te Oneroa-a-Tōhē has also been a critical source of food and plant life, and continues to supplement the diets of Te Rarawa people into the present. Te Oneroa-a-Tōhē is our takutaimoana, a part of our very being.
It is the Te Rarawa view that Te Oneroa-a-Tōhē is a name with iconic status for all Iwi of the Far North. Consequently, Te Rarawa seeks the reinstatement of the name with preeminence and the English language name “90 mile Beach” secondary.” 
Aroha Harris – 10 February 2008
 Ngāti Kuri, Te Aupouri, NgāiTakoto and Te Rarawa are four of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These four iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the long coast of Tōhē, descriptively and figuratively for his many endeavours"""
Te Paki,"'Northland, near Cape Reinga. Lit. te: the; paki: fine weather (and other meanings).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Teparapara Bay,"Instead of ""Picnic Bay"". Teparapara was shown in early records by A H Pickmere "
Tepene,"'The Maori form of Stephenson, an early missionary in these parts.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Te Puna Inlet,"Formerly Mongonui Inlet, the name was changed to Mangonui Inlet in 1926, and confirmed in 1936. The name was changed to Ti Mangonui Inlet in 1940, although this was not widely used and never appeared on any maps. In a review of the 1940 decision in 1962 the name was once again to change to Mangonui, but the Bay of Islands County Council objected on the grounds of duplication with Mangonui Harbour in Doubtless Bay. The Geographic Board suggested Te Puna Inlet, Te Puna being the former name for part of the inlet. Instead of Ti Mangonui Inlet (29/07/1948 42:939)"
Te Rae o te Rakau,"Te Rae o te Rakau means ""the headland where the tree is"". This point was named as the point where a particular kahika (pohutukawa) tree grows. The tree and the cliff are very prominent on the landscape and used as markers for several toka (fishing grounds). Change from Black Point.; 'Lit. The headland of the tree.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Te Raupua,"Māori Elders of the area recalled the name Te Raupua, meaning ""the place from where the sun on the sea appears like sun light on leaves"". The word Rau means ""leaf"" and Pua means ""seed"" or ""bud"". From the highest peak one can look down an expansive valley to the sea in the direction of the setting sun, hence the derivation of the name. Mr John Klaricich advised that the translated meaning could differ from area to area, but the translation given is that accepted by the elders who recalled the name. "
Te Rawhiti Inlet,See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMEVDRDU4NUEwRDEwMUQ5NjAzMEI) 
Te Reinga Bay,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Te Ringa 
Te Rere Bay,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
Ingoa tuturu/tawhito
•	Means to take flight or to fly
•	Time of tupuna migratory birds 
Kuaka (Godwit) utilised bay as feeding stop prior to departure. It is assumed that the noise of their flight gave rise to the naming of the Bay.
All the information has been orally provided by our Kaumatua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by Kaumatua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as Kaumatua Rawiri Henare and Kaumatua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s and early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information. ’
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare Kaumatua Mangatowai Marae.
 "
Te Ringa Bay,Replaced by Te Reinga Bay 26/11/1953 67:1920 
Te Tauroa," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the long waiting of Kahutianui for the return of her father"""
Te Tawa Hill,On Section 2F Hauai Rawhiti Block 
Te Tii,"Replaced by Te Ti Mangonui 1943 Hon p. 35; 'Officially the name was changed to Te Ti-o-Mangonui in 1943, but Te Tii persists. The vowel in ti is long, indicated by the double ‘i’ in this instance rather than by a macron.
' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Te Ti Mangonui,"Instead of ""Te Tii"" "
Te Toroa Bay,Previously shown on maps as Te Roa Bay. 
Te Umukukupa Point,Replaced by Karaui Point 1943 Hon p. 12 
Te Whatu / Berghan Point,"Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement: This is a very old name it was supported by the kaumatua. Named during the arrival of the migratory Tupuna canoes. All the information has been orally provided by our Kaumatua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by Kaumatua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi. He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information.” See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMEFCMzc0MDAxQzBGRjk5NDdBRDc) Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""a name from the time of the waka migration"""
Tikitikiora,Replaced by Tikitikioure Hill 1940 Hon p. 36 
Tikitikiora,Replaced by Tikitikioure 1940 Hon p. 36 
Tikitikioure,"Not ""Tikitikiora"" "
Ti Mangonui Inlet,Replaced by Te Puna Inlet 17/12/1964 79:2365 
Tiriparepa / Scott Point,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
This name is associated with the lifting of tapu, the repa is a flax cloak used in the process of lifting a tapu. Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""for the flax cloak used in the lifting of tapu"""
Tohoraha / Mount Camel,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history: Tohoraha means whale. This site was named by Kupe while he was still out at sea, before he had landed in Aotearoa (Brief of evidence of Rapata Romana for the Wai 262 claim). Dorothy Urlich Cloher notes that “Maunga Tohoraha or Mt Camel is one of the sites on the spiritual pathway on the east coast” (The Tribes of Muriwhenua: Their Origins and Stories Auckland University Press, 2002, p. 34). See [history relating to Cook's place names](https://earth.google.com/web/data=Mj8KPQo7CiExMjJfZ1puZmJFV2hFRFlvSFVNVG5YU05CRWZTYTBfSWoSFgoUMDgzNkIwMUU4QjBGRUE2MUFFNkE) Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the whale as viewed by Kupe out at sea"""
Tokatokahau Point,Instead of Mosquito 
Tokawhero Forest,Asscoiated with Tokawhero Stream 
Tokerau," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""the north, a Hawaiki name"""
Totara North,"'In the early days mail was brought here by sea from Kerikeri, and the captain was accustomed to tie his vessel to a large totara tree by the Iwitawa bridge. The residents spoke of the mail being put off at the Totara or just Totara. When a post office opened it was given this name, and ‘North’ added to distinguish it from Totara in the South Island. The tree died after the road was tar-sealed and fill was deposited around its base. Maori name: Tametame: lit. To move the lips. See Whangaroa.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Totoare,Not named on previous mapping. Not Toteare. 
Toupiroroa Range,Change from Rangiawhia Range 
Towai,"'Northland, 18 km from Kawakawa. Lit. towai: a native tree (Weinmannia silvicola).' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tuatara Pool,"One of a series of names in the Poor Knights Islands submitted by J A Bartle in February 1966. These were submitted to enable reference to localities on the islands to be made when publishing articles on the plants and animals of the island group. The name is derived from the fact that on several occasions large Tuataras have been seen bathing in it, especially on hot days. Too small to show on maps, see Minutes XXXIX p 45 for location map. "
Tuhipa,"'It is said that three pa were ‘planned’ on the hill site.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tui Lake,"Tui Lake was named by Thomas Bell (1839-1929) who with his family settled on Raoul Island in 1878, remaining there until 1914. The name was bestowed because of the large number of tūī (Prosthemadera novaseelandiae) observed catching insects in the pōhutukawa trees (Metrosideros kermadecensis) that surrounded the lake. Surveyor and ethnologist, Stephenson Percy Smith (1840-1922) who was sent to the Kermadec Islands by the New Zealand government to oversee its annexation, included the lake on his 1887 map of Raoul Island but did not record any name for it. However, naturalist WRB Oliver (1883-1957), who spent 12 months on Raoul Island in 1907-08, recorded Tui Lake on the map included in his 1909 article on the vegetation of the Kermadec Islands. The name was also shown on government surveyor J Allan Henderson’s topographical survey map of the island completed in 1939 and based on fieldwork in 1937-38. "
Tūparehuia," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""garland decorated with huia feathers"""
Tuputupungahau Island,"This is the traditional Māori name for this island, provided by Makari Matiu, the derivation is unknown. Ngati Kahu used to have a whaling station on this island and Makati's Grandfather was a harpoonist. Change from Whale Island, which was presumably named for the whaling station that used to be there.; 'Lit. Increasing the winds. Also known as Tukutukungāhau: lit. Releasing the winds. McCully and Pātana Matiu recount that a large blowhole gives the name to the island.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Tūtātarakihi,"NgāiTakoto history:
With regards to Tatarakihi it has had its name shortened from that of Tutatarakihi (Tu is to uphold, stand upright). This is an old Ngāi Takoto pā situated on the western end of Kaitaia Aerodrome. It is part of a series of pā that were built along the mountain range from the edge of the Rangaunu to the last pā in Kaitaia, which is Kerekere. On a map, you can see Wharekakariki and next to that is Tutatarakihi, which is by the airport. Early maps of the 1800's that Ngāi Takoto has found also name it as Tutatarakihi. This confirms the historical korero of the iwi to that name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""not known"""
Tuturuowae,"Instead of ""Tuturuowai"" "
Tuturuowai,Replaced by Tuturuowae 10/10/1974 100:2163 
Umawera,"'Northland, 26 km from Okaihau. Lit. uma: breast; wera: burnt. The name was given because of an incident in which a child was badly burnt.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Urupukapuka Island,Instead of Oruapukapuka 
Utakura,"'Garry G. Hooker points to a variety of accounts of the name’s meaning, but argues for a Ngati Awa interpretation that Te Kura-a-Maui is the origin of the name Utakura. Using the interpretation ‘treasure of Maui’, Utakura could mean Precious land.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waewiri Island,Replaced by Waiwiri Island 1943 Hon p. 41 
Wahakari Lake,Origin and meaning unknown. 
Waiaua Bay,"'Lit. wai: water; au: current. See also Polkinghornes Bay, Swann Beach.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waihaha,"'There is another stream with the same name in the Hauraki Gulf district; it is linked with Waihihi, both names having been imported from the homeland.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waiharara,"The following explanation of the name was given by J C Andersen, ""The word harara, a shortening of harahara means diminishing or growing less. The Mahuhu canoe when working north long ago called at Houhora; it was mid-summer, and they found a difficulty in getting fresh water; springs and streams had diminished or disappeared, hence the place was called Waiharara"".; 'Almost certainly a corruption of Waiharere, the name of the stream where the settlement is located; lit. wai: stream; harere: heard indistinctly.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waiharara School,Named after the locality in which the school is located. 
Waiharera Creek,"Replaced by Waiparera Stream 22/12/1954 80:2088 There was some confusion, at the drawing of the provisional mile sheets of this area  in 1945, over the names Waiharara, and Waiharera.  Given these two options, Sir Apirana Ngata stated that Waiharara would be the more usual, but the decision was left to the Native Department, who chose Waiharera.  It appears that Waiparera was the correct name, and the tail of the p was shortened when written somewhere, and interpreted as Waiharera, which was duly approved and gazetted.  The situation was corrected for the creek, and confirmed for the lake in 1954. "
Waihe Bay,Replaced by Waihi Bay 1944 Hon p. 39 
Waihi Bay,"Not ""Waihe"" "
Waihoanga Creek,"Not ""Pirau"" or ""Waiohanga"" "
Waihopo,"'A river one fears to cross.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waikare Island,Replaced by Motutokape Island 24/07/1975 62:1632 
Waimā,"''Lit. wai: river; ma: white or clear. The name may have originated in Hawaiki and be, in full, Waimatuhirangi.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010.' "
Waimā Forest,Associated with Waima (locality) Orthographic correction from Waima Forest
Waimamaku,"'The full name is Waima-makunui-a-Rua, and can be translated as The luxuriously ferned clear water of Rua; Rua was a descendant of Te Kuri and a contemporary of Rahiri. Waima is to the east of Waimamaku, Waiwhatawhata to the west.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waimanoni,"'Possibly indicating that the stream was deflected by a bend.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waimate North,"'This early missionary settlement was first known as Waimate, with several variations of spelling before Maori orthography was fixed. The word North was added to avoid confusion with Waimate in Canterbury.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waimā Valley,"A descriptive name for the valley containing Waimā River. Waimā literally translates as clear water but according to Sir Āpriana Ngata (1874-1950) the full name was Waima-tuhi-rangi after a village and valley in Tahiti. In 1828 a gathering of chiefs met in the valley in the aftermath of the death of Hongi Hika (1772-1828) and after one of the sons of Patuone (?-1872) had been killed, to reach a peace agreement. In 1836 timber trader and Additional British Resident Thomas McDonnell (1788-1864), a controversial figure, claimed to have purchased sizable areas along Waimā River. By the 1860s Wesleyan missionaries thought the ‘spiritual condition’ of the Māori in the valley was low, but they applauded their industry and efforts at improvement in ‘fencing all their lands and building timber houses’. A scene from a decade later was recalled by a one time resident in 1925, ‘Nearly the whole country in those days was under heavy bush, the valley being a picture of beauty; forest-clad hills on either hand, the alluvial flats verdantly green with the cultivations of the many Māori farmers’. Plentiful peaches were fed to pigs with kūmara, taro, rīwai (Māori potatoes) and Indian corn being the staple foods in addition to pork and fish. In 1898 Waimā Valley was the location of the ‘dog tax rebellion’ – a refusal to pay an annual 2/6d license fee resisted by being little involved in the cash economy and using their dogs for hunting. Armed Māori visited Rawene to voice their opposition to this and other taxes and a closed season on pigeons and ducks, a formal declaration of war having been sent by telegram to the Resident Magistrate in Russell. Premier Richard Seddon sent troops under Lieutenant Colonel Stewart Newall, who marched on the valley heading towards an ambush. Only the intervention of MP Hōne Heke Ngāpua (1869-1909) persuaded one of the leaders of the ‘rebellion’ Hōne Tōia (1858?-1933) to surrender and call off the planned ambush. "
Wainiu Island,Replaced by Wainui Island 1943 Hon p. 40 
Wainui,"'Lit. wai: river; nui: big. It is a common name, appearing in many parts of New Zealand' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Wainui Island,"Not ""Wainiu"" "
Waiohanga Creek,Replaced by Waihoanga Creek 1943 Hon p. 39 
Waiomio,"'The name is apparently a corruption of Waiamio, and Walter Kawiti defined the meaning as Meandering water.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waiotemarama,"'Maori tell a legend of the moon coming down to drink the water. The name originally applied to a tributary of the Waimamaku River, and was later applied to a kainga that was established on the site of the present settlement.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waiotu,"'Northland, 28 km from Whangarei. Lit. wai: water; o: of; Tu. The personal name could conceivably be short for Tumatauenga, the god of war.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waipahihi Creek,"'Lit. wai: water; pahihi: welling up, or flowing in driblets. The name was given by Tohe.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waipapa Bay,"Named for the canoe Waipapa, which is petrified as a large rock on the sandy beach in the middle of the bay. Change from Whataru Bay which was derived from the name of an old man who lived there in the 1950's, hence Whataru's Bay. This name was replaced with the traditional name for the bay. "
Waipapakauri,"'Lit. wai: water; papa: flat; kauri: tree (Agathis australis); which may mean Swampy ground where the kauri grow.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waipapa Point,Replaced by Pumanawa Point 8/12/1994 133:4349 
Waipiro Bay,Off Parekura Bay 
Wairaka Beach,"Name provided by Makari Matiu, derivation unknown.; 'Originally just Wairaka: lit. melon.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Wairaupō,Māori name for Milford Island (1943 Hon p. 19) 
Waitangi,"'Northland, Bay of Islands. Lit. wai: waters; tangi: noisy or weeping. The noise probably refers to the Waitangiharuru falls on the river. The name is to be found in many parts of New Zealand — in Gisborne, Canterbury, West Coast, the Chatham Island and Otago (in the form Waitaki, q.v.). Amiria Manutahi Stirling was told by Sir Apirana Ngata that the name meant ‘wailing waters’, and originated from people of the first canoes, who heard voices that they identified as their ancestors farewelling them from across the sea.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waitangi Forest,"Associated with Waitangi (locality), Waitangi Stream.  "
Waitapu,"'Northland, Hokianga Harbour. Lit. wai: water; tapu: sacred or forbidden.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Waitepipī Bay," Ngatikahu ki Whangaroa statement:
‘Area used to soak /leach salt from kaimoana /shell fish in the two streams located here as were many of the streams that flow form this whenua.  Both streams which discharge in this bay were utilised to leach salt from kaimoana the name means to do just that its complete name is Te wahi i mau nga pipi ki te wai maori or whakawai maori nga kai moana (pipi) (Matua Wake Tua pers con July 2014).’
All the information has been orally provided by our Kaumatua Wake Tua whom is 90 years of age, and states that he received this information from his grandfather Motukiwi Hone Tua, and ably supported by Kaumatua Rawiri Timoti whose great great grandmother Maungaroa was an elder sister to Motukiwi as well as Kaumatua Rawiri Henare and Kaumatua Pita Pangari.
He has in his possession minutes (papatupu books) of the Land Commissioner’s hearings in Kaeo during their investigations of land ownership during the late 1800s and early 1900s, but will not allow transcribing or copying for fear of losing this long held information.
Information also provided orally by Matua Rawiri Henare Kaumatua Mangatowai Marae.
"
Waiwiri Island,"Not ""Waewiri"" "
Wakatehāua Island,"Te Aupouri history: Mutu Kapa (kaumatua of Whanau Pani hapu of Te Aupouri) stated at the Māori Land Court's 1957 Te Oneroa a Tōhē title investigation that “when they reached Maunganui, Tōhē looked out into the ocean and saw an object resembling a canoe. He stated that the object looked like a canoe that God made for fishing. From that he gave that object the name Te Waka e Haua”. (Northern Minute Book Vol 85, 1957.  Copy of the Record of Proceedings of the Māori Land Court at Kaitaia on Nov 12-15, 1957, p. 719). Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""Tōhē considered it looked like a waka the gods made for fishing"""
Whāingaroa," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""refers to the exasperation ""what a long journey"" of a woman waiting for her warrior husband who went south"""
Whakarongorua Point,The original Māori name for this point. Not named on previous map or chart. Also referred to as South Point 
Whakatere,Replaced by Raeroa 16/11/1950 70:1989 
Whakatere Peak,Origin and meaning unknown. 
Whananaki,"'The name may correctly be Whananake, but there is no clear explanation for this.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Whangākea / Pandora,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
This place was named in reference to the kea that lived in this area. Kea were caught here at this nohonga kainga. This site was an important pā and mahinga mataitai. The tupuna associated with Whangakea were Kakati, Kaaka, Tupuni, Tōhē and Ikanui. The last chief who lived there was Raukarora, of Te Aupouri.
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""where kea were caught"""
Whangapē,"An original Māori name. Where Tōhē found people harvesting karaka berries and an ancient pā of Ue Oneone. Ethnologist and Honorary New Zealand Geographic Board member Johannes Andersen (1873-1962) believed this was an ‘imported name’ following ethnologist Elsdon Best (1856-1931), another Honorary New Zealand Geographic Board member, who considered Fa’a referred to a valley on Tahaa Island in Tahiti and that whanga was used to denote an expanse of space of water, land or air. Whangapē along with Hokianga were landing places of the Māmari waka captained by Ruanui. Numbers of pā were at various times built along the length of the harbour. Timber trader and controversial Additional British Resident Thomas McDonnell (1788-1864) recorded the harbour as ‘false Hokianga’ on his 1834 chart because of the similarity of the headlands, although after the loss of HMS Osprey in 1846 this informal name was reapplied to Herekino Harbour. An account from 1837 noted that Māori had cleared and enclosed gardens which extended up to near the tops of the hillsides. In 1874 Edwin Torrens Brissenden (1837-1907), Land Purchase Commissioner at Hokianga, purchased Te Ana Tuturu Block at Whangapē and began negotiations for another 21000 acres (8498 ha). That same year John Fairchild (1835-98), captain of the government steamer Luna, surveyed the entrance of Whangapē Harbour, which he repeated in 1889 finding all the soundings 3ft (90cm) shallower. A Whangapē export kauri (Agathis australis) timber industry commenced in the late 1870s. By 1905 the Mitchelson Timber Company, controlled by (Sir) Edwin Mitchelson (1846-1934), was operating from Whangapē with an estimated supply of four to five years. The mill employed 16 hands, had a cutting capacity of 5,000,000 superficial feet p.a. and in 1907 had cut 4,000,000 superficial feet. This was the largest firm independent of the Kauri Timber Company operating in North Auckland. "
Whangapēkaraka," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""ancient pā of Ue Oneone"""
Whangapēkaraka," Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""where Tōhē found people harvesting karaka berries"""
Whangaroa,"'Whangaroa Harbour: lit. whanga: harbour; roa: long. Several authorities are of the opinion that the name came from Hawaiki. So far as the post office is concerned, the following changes have occurred during the past century. The office opened as Ruato on 1 August 1870; on 1 March 1872, when the original office of Whangaroa changed its name to Totara (later Totara North), Ruato was named Wangaroa. This was corrected to Whangaroa on 1 December 1896.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Whangaruru,"'Whangaruru Harbour: lit. whanga: harbour; ruru: morepork (Ninox novaeseelandiae); or ruru: sheltered, or to take shelter. Sheltered harbour is more likely to be the true meaning.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Whangaruru North,"A name borrowed from the harbour of the same name, with Whakaruru Pā historic site on the headland. The ocean-going waka Māhuhu or more fully Mahuhu-ki-e-rangi captained in one tradition by Rongomai, reached New Zealand near North Cape then sailed south to Whangaroa, to Whangaruru, and eventually on to East Cape. Missionary Samuel Marsden (1765-1838) visited the harbour in 1820, which he phonetically rendered as ‘Wangadoodoo’. J Macquarie Palmer, in making a pre-Treaty of Waitangi land purchase in January 1840, used the spelling ‘Wangaruru’. In 1859 Archdeacon Henry Willliams (1792-1867) recorded how his party ‘reached the next settlement, called Whangadudu’ where friendly Māori provided food and shelter for which Williams’ ‘gave them some fishhooks’. A native school was opened in what was then just Whangaruru in 1891. The New Zealand Geological Survey Geological map of Bay of Islands, Russell and Whangaruru Survey Districts drawn by George Edward Harris (1874-1932) and published in 1922 also labels the settlement Whangaruru. Lands and Survey published a cadastral map of the Whangaururu Survey District in 1926, the work of chief draughtsman Harry Edward Walshe (1883-1948), later Surveyor General and member of the Honorary Geographic Board. This map depicted the wāhi tapu and Native School Reserve all labelled as Whangaruru. Almost opposite across the harbour was another Whangaruru, where a post office was located on Tokitoki Point, but this was not shown on the first 1:63360 topographical map NZMS1 in 1942. In 1939 the New Zealand Herald first referred to Whangaruru North. This use was continued on the earliest 1942 NZMS1 topographical maps. Edward Dollimore (1904-73) noted in his 1952 New Zealand Guide that Whangaruru was ‘sometimes’ called Whangaruru North, hinting at an alternative use. However, by 1962 he had further adjusted his stance to list the settlement as Whangaruru Beach ‘formerly Whangaruru North’. However, the 1964 cadastral map used Whangaruru North and also located Whangaruru South. By 1970 the area opposite Whangaruru North, on inland from Tamateatai Point and flanking Punaruku Estuary, was now labelled Whangaruru. "
Whangaruru South,"Named for the harbour and in association with Whangaruru North. As a locality, the name appears in newspapers from 1922. The locality was unnamed on both the New Zealand Geological Survey map of 1922 and Lands and Survey’s cadastral map published in 1926 A named post office was established in 1910 and a telegraph office added in 1926 the same year in which local farmers gave Whangaruru South as their address for the Sheep Returns. In 1936 the Whangaruru South Native School, its name suggesting that ‘Whangaruru South’ included the southern portion of Whangaruru North peninsula as well as the western side of the harbour, was shifted across the water to a new site at present day Whangaruru South. In 1940 the area gained fleeting national attention when a ticket inscribed ‘Mac’ won the first prize of £2000 in the Art Union raffle. Whangaruru South was recorded on Sheet 16 of the first national topographical series NZMS1 in 1942 although shown north of Ōkiore Point / Rugged Point to the headland separating Ōakura Bay and Ohawini Bay. Whangaruru South again featured in the newspapers in 1947 when two yellow bellied sea snakes washed up on the beach. The 1964 cadastral series show Whangaruru South was at its current position in the northern part of Ōakura Bay. "
Whareana Bay,Literal translation is cave house. Instead of Whareane 
Whareane Bay,Replaced by Whareana Bay 26/11/1953 67:1920 
Wharekāpu / Paxton Point,"Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri history:
This site has great significance as part of Te Ara Wairua (the spiritual pathway).
Piri Paraone mentioned Wharekāpu in a korero about the spiritual pathway: ""I timata mai i tera taha, ko o tatou matua i heke mai i tenei tahataha, ahu atu ki Ngāti Kahu, Ngai Takoto, Ngāti Rehia. Kia rere mai i Rangaunu, Houhora ki Wharekaapu, i Rangiora, tatu ki Murimotu, kia huri kia ahu anooo ki Te Reinga. Ki tera taha ko te Oneroa a Tōhē. Tona ingoa tuatahi ko te Ara Wairua"". 
""It begins on the east side ascending from this side onwards to Ngāti Kahu, Ngāti Takoto, and Ngāti Rehia. The flight begins at Rangaunu (Doubtless Bay), Houhora to Wharekaapu to Rangiora, setting down at Murimotu and turning in the direction of Te Reinga. On the other side is Te Oneroa a Tōhē. The original name for this coast being Te Ara Wairua, the spiritual pathway' (submitted in the evidence of Waerete Norman to the Waitangi Tribunal and cited in Stokes, 'A Review of the Evidence of the Muriwhenua Lands Claims, Vol 2, p. 718).
Reverend Māori Marsden noted in his evidence to the Waitangi Tribunal that Wharekaapu was a pā of the Ngāti Awa people on the southern side of Parengarenga. The Ngāti Awa people occupied the foreshore of Rarawa between Parengarenga and Houhora for a time. Reverend Marsden recounts fighting between Ngāti Kaha (the people of Pohurihanga of the Kurahaupo waka), who were assisted by Ihutara, and Ngāti Awa. Ihutara was slain at Wharekaapu pā and his body taken by his son Taihaupapa to an island in the Parengarenga Harbour where three dogs were slain for the 'whangai-hau' ceremony of the funeral rites (Te Mana o Te Hiku o Te Ika', Wai 45, Doc A7,p.5 and 6).
This name has its origins in the word wharekaapunipuni - a gathering place and an assembly point after battles or skirmishes. However, it was better known as a training place for young Te Aupouri warriors. They lived, cultivated and harvested rawa whenua and preserved kaimoana. Urupa are often exposed by the elements here. 
 Ngāti Kuri and Te Aupouri are two of the iwi which make up Te Hiku Forum. These two iwi have shared Treaty settlement redress including this geographic name. Published on [346-01 edition 2 (2023) – Te Ika-a-Māui](https://www.linz.govt.nz/resources/guide/te-ika-maui-tangata-whenua-place-names-map): ""from wharekāpunipuni, an assembly point after battle"""
Wharekau,Replaced by Wharekawa 26/11/1953 67:1920 
Wharekawa,Origin and meaning unknown. Instead of Wharekau 
Whare Ngarahu,"The literal meaning for the name is ""house of cinders"" but the specific reason for giving this name is unknown. This ridge was an important lookout place for spotting whales moving north. Signal fires would be lit to indicate a pod of whales passing, so that people could put out from Waipapa Bay (Whataru) and intercept them off Whakapouaka. The signal fires may be the reason for the name Whare ngarahu. Not on Topo Map? "
Wharepoke Falls,"Name in local use. It is thought that the name, which loosely means ""haunted house"" or ""spirit house"" refers to the cliffs pocketed with holes and caverns which were a burial ground. "
Whataru Bay,Replaced by Waipapa Bay 13/07/1995 69:1847 
Whatuwhiwhi,"'In Te Whānau Moana the name is given as deriving from 'Ngā kōwhatu i whiwhia', meaning' The rocks that were ensnared'.' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Whiorau Bay,Off Parekura Bay 
Whirinaki,"'Lit. to lean, or the buttress of a house. Of the Northland Whirinaki, Garry Hooker cited the origin of the name as being Tangirere, who compared the pile of kumaras in a storage pit to a line of men against a fence: ‘The term, I feel, is probably a contraction of Kaka-whirinaki and perhaps could be freely translated as a line of even wooden buttresses.’' Source: Reed, A.W. & Peter Dowling, Place Names of New Zealand, 2010. "
Whitiora Pa,"Approved as the name of a Pa site within the locality of Te Ti Mangonui. The Pa was named after a request from the Absolute Maori Co-op Association to have the Pa and the Post Office in the area named Whiti Ora Pa. The Post and Telegraph Department declined Whitiora Pa as the Post Office name, to avoid confusion with Whitiora in hamilton. Whiti Ora was stated to translate from Māori as ""the transition period"". A sketch plan of the area can be seen in Correspondance XXII, p147. "
